Survey Type,Survey Topic,Survey Title,State,Citation,Summary of Law,Law,Source
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Alabama,AL ST § 26-23H-4.,Abortion prohibited except in cases of medical emergency.,"(a) It shall be unlawful for any person to intentionally perform or attempt to perform an abortion except as provided for by subsection (b).
(b) An abortion shall be permitted if an attending physician licensed in Alabama determines that an abortion is necessary in order to prevent a serious health risk to the unborn child's mother. Except in the case of a medical emergency as defined herein, the physician's determination shall be confirmed in writing by a second physician licensed in Alabama. The confirmation shall occur within 180 days after the abortion is completed and shall be prima facie evidence for a permitted abortion.",https://www.legislature.state.al.us/pdf/SearchableInstruments/2023RS/SB35-int.pdf
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Alabama,AL ST § 26-23H-4.,This bill would create exceptions to the prohibition on abortion for pregnancies resulting from rape or incest.,"Relating to abortion; to amend Sections 13A-13-7 and 26-23H-4, Code of Alabama 1975; to add certain exceptions to the abortion prohibition. BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA: Section 1. Sections 13A-13-7 and 26-23H-4, Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows: ""§13A-13-7 Any person who willfully administers to any pregnant woman any drug or substance or uses or employs any instrument or other means to induce an abortion, miscarriage or premature delivery or aids, abets or prescribes for the same, unless the same doing so is necessary to preserve her the mother's life or health and done for that purpose or unless the pregnancy is the result of an act of rape or incest, shall on conviction be fined not less than $100.00 nor more than $1,000.00 and may also be imprisoned in the county jail or sentenced to hard labor for the county for not more than 12 months. (1) For the purposes of this section, a person commits rape if he or she does any of the following: a. Engages in sexual intercourse with another person by forcible compulsion. b. Engages in sexual intercourse with another person who is incapable of consent by reason of being incapacitated. c. Being 16 years of age or older, engages in sexual intercourse with another person who is less than 12 years old. (2) For the purposes of this section, a person commits incest if he or she engages in sexual intercourse with a person he or she knows to be any of the following, either legitimately or illegitimately: a. His or her ancestor or descendant by blood or adoption. b. His or her brother or sister of the whole or half-blood or by adoption. c. His or her stepchild or stepparent, while the marriage creating the relationship exists. d. His or her aunt, uncle, nephew, or niece of the whole or half-blood."" ""§26-23H-4 (a) It shall be unlawful for any person to intentionally perform or attempt to perform an abortion except as provided for by in subsection (b). (b)(1) An abortion shall be permitted if an attending physician licensed in Alabama determines that an abortion is necessary in order to prevent a serious health risk to the unborn child's mother. Except in the case of a medical emergency as defined herein, the physician's determination shall be confirmed in writing by a second physician licensed in Alabama. The confirmation shall occur within 180 days after the abortion is completed and shall be prima facie evidence for a permitted abortion. (2) An abortion shall be permitted if the pregnancy is a result of rape or incest. a. For the purposes of this section, an individual commits rape if he or she does any of the following: 1. Engages in sexual intercourse with another individual by forcible compulsion. 2. Engages in sexual intercourse with another individual who is incapable of consent by reason of being incapacitated. 3. Being 16 years of age or older, engages in sexual intercourse with another individual who is less than 12 years old. b. For the purposes of this section, an individual commits incest if he or she engages in sexual intercourse with an individual he or she knows to be any of the following, either legitimately or illegitimately:1 . His or her ancestor or descendant by blood or adoption. 2. His or her brother or sister of the whole or half-blood or by adoption. 3. His or her stepchild or stepparent, while the marrigae creating the relationship exists. 4. His or her aunt, uncle, nephew, or niece of the whole or half-blood."" Section 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2023, following its passage and approval by the Governor, or its otherwise becoming law.",https://www.legislature.state.al.us/pdf/SearchableInstruments/2023RS/SB35-int.pdf
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Alaska,AK ST 18.16.090.,"Certain procedures, including those to
remove a dead fetus, are excluded from the definition of """"abortion"""".","(1) ""abortion"" means the use or prescription of an instrument, medicine, drug, or other substance or device to terminate the pregnancy of a woman known to be pregnant, except that ""abortion"" does not include the termination of a pregnancy if done with the intent to
(A) save the life or preserve the health of the unborn child;
(B) deliver the unborn child prematurely to preserve the health of both the pregnant woman and the woman's child; or
(C) remove a dead unborn child;
(2) ""unemancipated"" means that a woman who is unmarried and under 17 years of age has not done any of the following:
(A) entered the armed services of the United States;
(B) become employed and self-subsisting;
(C) been emancipated under AS 09.55.590; or
(D) otherwise become independent from the care and control of the woman's parent, guardian, or custodian.",
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Arizona,"AZ ST §
36-2321 et al.","Abortion prohibited after 15 weeks except in cases of medical
emergency.","In this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

1. ""Abortion"" has the same meaning prescribed in section 36-2151.
2. ""Attempt to perform or induce an abortion"" means to do or to omit doing anything that, under the circumstances as the physician believes them to be, is an act or omission that constitutes a substantial step in a course of conduct planned to culminate in the performance or induction of an abortion in violation of this article.
3. ""Department"" means the department of health services.
4. ""Gestational age"" or ""probable gestational age"" means the age of an unborn human being as calculated from the first day of the last menstrual period of the pregnant woman.
5. ""Human being"" means an individual member of the species homo sapiens, from and after the point of conception.
6. ""Major bodily function"" includes functions of the immune system, normal cell growth, and digestive, bowel, bladder, neurological, brain, respiratory, circulatory, endocrine and reproductive functions.
7. ""Medical emergency"" means a condition that, on the basis of the physician's good faith clinical judgment, so complicates the medical condition of a pregnant woman as to necessitate the immediate abortion of her pregnancy to avert her death or for which a delay will create serious risk of substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function.
8. ""Physician"" means a person who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 13 or 17.

A. Except in a medical emergency, a physician may not perform, induce or attempt to perform or induce an abortion unless the physician or the referring physician has first made a determination of the probable gestational age of the unborn human being and documented that gestational age in the maternal patient's chart and, if required, in a report required to be filed with the department as set forth in subsection C of this section. The determination of probable gestational age shall be made according to standard medical practices and techniques used in the medical community.
B. Except in a medical emergency, a physician may not intentionally or knowingly perform, induce or attempt to perform or induce an abortion if the probable gestational age of the unborn human being has been determined to be greater than fifteen weeks.
C. In every case in which a physician performs or induces an abortion on an unborn human being whose gestational age is greater than fifteen weeks, the physician, within fifteen days after the abortion, shall file with the department, on a form supplied by the department, a report containing all of the following:
1. The date the abortion was performed.
2. Specific method of abortion used.
3. The probable gestational age of the unborn human being and the method used to calculate gestational age.
4. A statement that the abortion was necessary because of a medical emergency.
5. The specific medical indications supporting the determination that a medical emergency existed.
6. The probable health consequences of the abortion.
7. The physician's signature as the physician's attestation under oath that the information stated is true and correct to the best of the physician's knowledge.
D. Reports required and submitted pursuant to subsection C of this section may not contain the name of the maternal patient on whom the abortion was performed or any other information or identifiers that would make it possible to identify, in any manner or under any circumstances, a woman who obtained or sought to obtain an abortion.

",
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Arizona,AZ ST § 36-2159.,"Abortion prohibited after 20 weeks exceptin cases of medical
emergency.","A. Except in a medical emergency, a person shall not perform, induce or attempt to perform or induce an abortion unless the physician or the referring physician has first made a determination of the probable gestational age of the unborn child. In making that determination, the physician or referring physician shall make any inquiries of the pregnant woman and perform or cause to be performed all medical examinations, imaging studies and tests as a reasonably prudent physician in the community, knowledgeable about the medical facts and conditions of both the woman and the unborn child involved, would consider necessary to perform and consider in making an accurate diagnosis with respect to gestational age.

B. Except in a medical emergency, a person shall not knowingly perform, induce or attempt to perform or induce an abortion on a pregnant woman if the probable gestational age of her unborn child has been determined to be at least twenty weeks.

C. A person who knowingly violates this section commits a class 1 misdemeanor.

D. A physician who knowingly violates this section commits an act of unprofessional conduct and is subject to license suspension or revocation pursuant to title 32, chapter 13 or 17.

E. In addition to other remedies available under the common or statutory law of this state, any of the following individuals may file a civil action to obtain appropriate relief for a violation of this section:

1. A woman on whom an abortion has been performed in violation of this section.

2. The father of the unborn child if the father is married to the mother at the time she received the abortion, unless the pregnancy resulted from the father's criminal conduct.

3. The maternal grandparents of the unborn child if the mother was not at least eighteen years of age at the time of the abortion, unless the pregnancy resulted from either of the maternal grandparent's criminal conduct.

F. A civil action filed pursuant to subsection E of this section shall be brought in the superior court in the county in which the woman on whom the abortion was performed resides. Relief pursuant to this subsection includes the following:

1. Money damages for all psychological, emotional and physical injuries resulting from the violation of this section.

2. Statutory damages in an amount equal to five thousand dollars or three times the cost of the abortion, whichever is greater.

3. Reasonable attorney fees and costs.

G. A civil action brought pursuant to this section must be initiated within six years after the violation occurred.

H. A woman on whom an abortion is performed or induced in violation of this section may not be prosecuted under this section or for conspiracy to commit a violation of this section.",
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Arizona,AZ ST § 36-2301.01.,"Abortion prohibited after viability except in cases of medical
emergency.","A. A physician shall not knowingly perform an abortion of a viable fetus unless:

1. The physician states in writing before the abortion is performed that the abortion is necessary to preserve the life or health of the woman, specifying the medical indications for and the probable health consequences of the abortion. The physician shall attach a copy of this statement to any fetal death report filed pursuant to section 11-593 or fetal death registration filed pursuant to section 36-329.

2. The physician uses the available method or technique of abortion most likely to preserve the life and health of the fetus, unless the use of such method or technique would present a greater risk to the life or health of the woman than the use of another available method or technique.

3. The physician states in writing the available methods or techniques considered, the method or technique used and the reasons for choosing that method or technique. The physician shall attach a copy of this statement to any fetal death report filed pursuant to section 11-593 or fetal death registration filed pursuant to section 36-329.

4. In addition to the physician performing the abortion, there is another physician in attendance who shall take control of and provide immediate medical care for a living child born as a result of the abortion.

5. The physician takes all reasonable steps during the performance of the abortion, consistent with the procedure used and in keeping with good medical practice, to preserve the life and health of the fetus, if these steps do not pose an increased risk to the life or health of the woman on whom the abortion is performed.

B. This section does not apply if there is a medical emergency.

C. For the purposes of this section and section 36-2301.02:

1. ""Abortion"" has the same meaning prescribed in section 36-2151.

2. ""Medical emergency"" means a condition that, on the basis of the physician's good faith clinical judgment, so complicates a pregnancy as to necessitate the immediate abortion of the pregnancy to avoid the woman's death or for which a delay will create serious risk of substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function.

3. ""Physician"" means any person licensed under title 32, chapter 13 or 17.

4. ""Viable fetus"" means the unborn offspring of human beings that has reached a stage of fetal development so that, in the judgment of the attending physician on the particular facts of the case, there is a reasonable probability of the fetus' sustained survival outside the uterus, with or without artificial support.",
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Arizona,AZ ST § 13-3603,Abortion prohibited without exception under Pre-Roe law.,"A person who provides, supplies or administers to a pregnant woman, or procures such woman to take any medicine, drugs or substance, or uses or employs any instrument or other means whatever, with intent thereby to procure the miscarriage of such woman, unless it is necessary to save her life, shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for not less than two years nor more than five years.",
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Arkansas,AR ST § 5-61-304,Abortion prohibited except in cases of medical emergency,"(a) A person shall not purposely perform or attempt to perform an abortion except to save the life of a pregnant woman in a medical emergency.

(b) Performing or attempting to perform an abortion is an unclassified felony with a fine not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or imprisonment not to exceed ten (10) years, or both.

(c) This section does not:

(1) Authorize the charging or conviction of a woman with any criminal offense in the death of her own unborn child; or

(2) Prohibit the sale, use, prescription, or administration of a contraceptive measure, drug, or chemical if the contraceptive measure, drug, or chemical is administered before the time when a pregnancy could be determined through conventional medical testing and if the contraceptive measure, drug, or chemical is sold, used, prescribed, or administered in accordance with manufacturer instructions.

(d) It is an affirmative defense to prosecution under this section if a licensed physician provides medical treatment to a pregnant woman which results in the accidental or unintentional injury or death to the unborn child.",
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Califonia,CA HLTH & S § 123466,"Abortions prohibited after viability except to preserve life or health of
the woman.","(a) The state shall not deny or interfere with a woman’s or pregnant person’s right to choose or obtain an abortion prior to viability of the fetus, or when the abortion is necessary to protect the life or health of the woman or pregnant person.

(b) A person shall not be compelled in a state, county, city, or other local criminal, administrative, legislative, or other proceeding to identify or provide information that would identify or that is related to an individual who has sought or obtained an abortion if the information is being requested based on either another state’s laws that interfere with a person’s rights under subdivision (a) or a foreign penal civil action, as defined in Section 2029.200 of the Code of Civil Procedure.",
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Colorado,,"No restrictions.",,
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Connecticut,CT ST §19a-602(b).,Abortions prohibited after viability unless to preserve the life or health of the pregnant woman.,"(a) The decision to terminate a pregnancy prior to the viability of the fetus shall be solely that of the pregnant woman in consultation with her physician.

(b) No abortion may be performed upon a pregnant woman after viability of the fetus except when necessary to preserve the life or health of the pregnant woman.",
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Delaware,DE ST TI 24 §1790,"Abortions prohibited after viability except to preserve life or health of the woman, or in cases of fetal anomaly without reasonable likelihood of survival.","(a) Any of the following may terminate, assist in the termination of, or attempt the termination of a human pregnancy before viability:
(1) A physician.
(2) A physician assistant with a collaborative agreement with an appropriately trained physician.
(3) A certified nurse midwife or certified nurse practitioner who demonstrates knowledge and competency including successful completion of a training or certification approved by the Board of Nursing.
(b) A physician may not terminate, attempt to terminate, or assist in the termination or attempt at termination of a human pregnancy otherwise than by birth after viability, unless, in the good faith medical judgment of the physician, the termination is necessary for the protection of the woman's life or health or in the event of a fetal anomaly for which there is not a reasonable likelihood of the fetus's sustained survival outside the uterus without extraordinary medical measures.
(c) A physician assistant or an advanced practice registered nurse may prescribe medication for the termination of pregnancy including Mifeprex, Mifepristone, and Misoprostol.",
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,District of Columbia,,"No restrictions.",,
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Florida,FL ST §390.0111,"Abortions prohibited after viability except to preserve life or health of the woman, or in cases of fatal fetal abnormality.","(1) TERMINATION IN THIRD TRIMESTER; WHEN ALLOWED.—No termination of pregnancy shall be performed on any human being in the third trimester of pregnancy unless one of the following conditions is met:
(a) Two physicians certify in writing that, in reasonable medical judgment, the termination of the pregnancy is necessary to save the pregnant woman’s life or avert a serious risk of substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function of the pregnant woman other than a psychological condition.
(b) The physician certifies in writing that, in reasonable medical judgment, there is a medical necessity for legitimate emergency medical procedures for termination of the pregnancy to save the pregnant woman’s life or avert a serious risk of imminent substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function of the pregnant woman other than a psychological condition, and another physician is not available for consultation.
(2) PERFORMANCE BY PHYSICIAN REQUIRED.—No termination of pregnancy shall be performed at any time except by a physician as defined in s. 390.011.
(3) CONSENTS REQUIRED.—A termination of pregnancy may not be performed or induced except with the voluntary and informed written consent of the pregnant woman or, in the case of a mental incompetent, the voluntary and informed written consent of her court-appointed guardian.
(a) Except in the case of a medical emergency, consent to a termination of pregnancy is voluntary and informed only if:
1. The physician who is to perform the procedure, or the referring physician, has, at a minimum, orally, while physically present in the same room, and at least 24 hours before the procedure, informed the woman of:
a. The nature and risks of undergoing or not undergoing the proposed procedure that a reasonable patient would consider material to making a knowing and willful decision of whether to terminate a pregnancy.
b. The probable gestational age of the fetus, verified by an ultrasound, at the time the termination of pregnancy is to be performed.",
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Florida,FL ST §390.0111,"Abortion prohibited after 6 weeks except to preserve life or health of the woman, or in cases of fatal fetal abnormality or result of rape, incest, or human trafficking.","(1) TERMINATION AFTER GESTATIONAL AGE OF 6 WEEKS; WHEN ALLOWED.—A physician may not knowingly perform or induce a termination of pregnancy if the physician determines the gestational age of the fetus is more than 6 weeks unless one of the following conditions is met:
(a) Two physicians certify in writing that, in reasonable medical judgment, the termination of the pregnancy is necessary to save the
pregnant woman’s life or avert a serious risk of substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function of the pregnant woman other than a psychological condition. (b) The physician certifies in writing that, in reasonable medical judgment, there is a medical necessity for legitimate emergency medical procedures for termination of the pregnancy to save the pregnant woman’s life or avert a serious risk of imminent substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function of the pregnant woman other than a psychological condition, and another physician is not available for consultation. (c) The pregnancy has not progressed to the third trimester and two physicians certify in writing that, in reasonable medical judgment, the fetus has a fatal fetal abnormality. (d) The pregnancy is the result of rape, incest, or human trafficking and the gestational age of the fetus is not more than 15 weeks as determined by the physician. At the time the woman schedules or arrives for her appointment to obtain the abortion, she must provide a copy of a restraining order, police report, medical record, or other court order or documentation providing evidence that she is obtaining the termination of pregnancy because she is a victim of rape, incest, or human trafficking. If the woman is 18 years of age or older, the physician must report any known or suspected human trafficking to a local law enforcement agency. If the woman is a minor, the physician must report the incident of rape, incest, or human trafficking to the central abuse hotline as required by s. 39.201.",
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Georgia,GA ST § 16-12-141(b).,"Abortions prohibited after heartbeat detectable except in cases of medical emergency or medically futile pregnancy, or for pregnancies caused by rape/incest prior to 20 weeks gestation.","(a) No abortion is authorized or shall be performed in violation of subsection (a) of Code Section 31-9B-2.

(b) (1) No abortion is authorized or shall be performed after the first trimester unless the abortion is performed in a licensed hospital, in a licensed ambulatory surgical center, or in a health facility licensed as an abortion facility by the Department of Community Health.

(2) An abortion shall only be performed by a physician licensed under Article 2 of Chapter 34 of Title 43.

(c) (1) No abortion is authorized or shall be performed if the probable gestational age of the unborn child has been determined in accordance with Code Section 31-9B-2 to be 20 weeks or more unless the pregnancy is diagnosed as medically futile, as such term is defined in Code Section 31-9B-1, or in reasonable medical judgment the abortion is necessary to:

(A) Avert the death of the pregnant woman or avert serious risk of substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function of the pregnant woman. No such condition shall be deemed to exist if it is based on a diagnosis or claim of a mental or emotional condition of the pregnant woman or that the pregnant woman will purposefully engage in conduct which she intends to result in her death or in substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function; or

(B) Preserve the life of an unborn child.

As used in this paragraph, the term ""probable gestational age of the unborn child"" has the meaning provided by Code Section 31-9B-1.

(2) In any case described in subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (1) of this subsection, the physician shall terminate the pregnancy in the manner which, in reasonable medical judgment, provides the best opportunity for the unborn child to survive unless, in reasonable medical judgment, termination of the pregnancy in that manner would pose a greater risk either of the death of the pregnant woman or of the substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function of the pregnant woman than would another available method. No such greater risk shall be deemed to exist if it is based on a diagnosis or claim of a mental or emotional condition of the pregnant woman or that the pregnant woman will purposefully engage in conduct which she intends to result in her death or in substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function. If the child is capable of sustained life, medical aid then available must be rendered.

(d) Hospital or other licensed health facility records shall be available to the district attorney of the judicial circuit in which the hospital or health facility is located.",
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Hawaii,HI ST § 453-16(b)," Abortion prohibited after viability.","§453-16  Intentional termination of pregnancy; penalties; refusal to perform.  (a)  No abortion shall be performed in this State unless:

     (1)  The abortion is performed by a licensed physician or surgeon, or by a licensed osteopathic physician and surgeon; and

     (2)  The abortion is performed in a hospital licensed by the department of health or operated by the federal government or an agency thereof, or in a clinic or physician's or osteopathic physician's office.

     (b)  Abortion shall mean an operation to intentionally terminate the pregnancy of a nonviable fetus.  The termination of a pregnancy of a viable fetus is not included in this section.

     (c)  The State shall not deny or interfere with a female's right to choose or obtain an abortion of a nonviable fetus or an abortion that is necessary to protect the life or health of the female.

     (d)  Any person who knowingly violates subsection (a) shall be fined not more than $1,000 or imprisoned not more than five years, or both.

     (e)  Nothing in this section shall require any hospital or any person to participate in an abortion nor shall any hospital or any person be liable for a refusal. ",
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Idaho,ID ST § 18-622,Abortion prohibited,"18-622.  CRIMINAL ABORTION. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this section shall become effective thirty (30) days following the occurrence of either of the following circumstances:
(a)  The issuance of the judgment in any decision of the United States supreme court that restores to the states their authority to prohibit abortion; or
(b)  Adoption of an amendment to the United States constitution that restores to the states their authority to prohibit abortion.
(2)  Every person who performs or attempts to perform an abortion as defined in this chapter commits the crime of criminal abortion. Criminal abortion shall be a felony punishable by a sentence of imprisonment of no less than two (2) years and no more than (5) years in prison. The professional license of any health care professional who performs or attempts to perform an abortion or who assists in performing or attempting to perform an abortion in violation of this subsection shall be suspended by the appropriate licensing board for a minimum of six (6) months upon a first offense and shall be permanently revoked upon a subsequent offense.
(3)  It shall be an affirmative defense to prosecution under subsection (2) of this section and to any disciplinary action by an applicable licensing authority, which must be proven by a preponderance of the evidence, that:
(a)(i)  The abortion was performed or attempted by a physician as defined in this chapter;
(ii)  The physician determined, in his good faith medical judgment and based on the facts known to the physician at the time, that the abortion was necessary to prevent the death of the pregnant woman. No abortion shall be deemed necessary to prevent the death of the pregnant woman because the physician believes that the woman may or will take action to harm herself; and
(iii) The physician performed or attempted to perform the abortion in the manner that, in his good faith medical judgment and based on the facts known to the physician at the time, provided the best opportunity for the unborn child to survive, unless, in his good faith medical judgment, termination of the pregnancy in that manner would have posed a greater risk of the death of the pregnant woman. No such greater risk shall be deemed to exist because the physician believes that the woman may or will take action to harm herself; or
(b)(i)  The abortion was performed or attempted by a physician as defined in this chapter;
(ii)  If the woman is not a minor or subject to a guardianship, then, prior to the performance of the abortion, the woman has reported the act of rape or incest to a law enforcement agency and provided a copy of such report to the physician who is to perform the abortion;
(iii) If the woman is a minor or subject to a guardianship, then, prior to the performance of the abortion, the woman or her parent or guardian has reported the act of rape or incest to a law enforcement agency or child protective services and a copy of such report has been provided to the physician who is to perform the abortion; and
(iv)  The physician who performed the abortion complied with the requirements of paragraph (a)(iii) of this subsection regarding the method of abortion.
(4)  Medical treatment provided to a pregnant woman by a health care professional as defined in this chapter that results in the accidental death of, or unintentional injury to, the unborn child shall not be a violation of this section.
(5)  Nothing in this section shall be construed to subject a pregnant woman on whom any abortion is performed or attempted to any criminal conviction and penalty.",
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Idaho,ID ST § 18-622,"Affirmative defense for abortions performed to prevent the death of
the pregnant woman","18-622.  CRIMINAL ABORTION. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this section shall become effective thirty (30) days following the occurrence of either of the following circumstances:
(a)  The issuance of the judgment in any decision of the United States supreme court that restores to the states their authority to prohibit abortion; or
(b)  Adoption of an amendment to the United States constitution that restores to the states their authority to prohibit abortion.
(2)  Every person who performs or attempts to perform an abortion as defined in this chapter commits the crime of criminal abortion. Criminal abortion shall be a felony punishable by a sentence of imprisonment of no less than two (2) years and no more than (5) years in prison. The professional license of any health care professional who performs or attempts to perform an abortion or who assists in performing or attempting to perform an abortion in violation of this subsection shall be suspended by the appropriate licensing board for a minimum of six (6) months upon a first offense and shall be permanently revoked upon a subsequent offense.
(3)  It shall be an affirmative defense to prosecution under subsection (2) of this section and to any disciplinary action by an applicable licensing authority, which must be proven by a preponderance of the evidence, that:
(a)(i)  The abortion was performed or attempted by a physician as defined in this chapter;
(ii)  The physician determined, in his good faith medical judgment and based on the facts known to the physician at the time, that the abortion was necessary to prevent the death of the pregnant woman. No abortion shall be deemed necessary to prevent the death of the pregnant woman because the physician believes that the woman may or will take action to harm herself; and
(iii) The physician performed or attempted to perform the abortion in the manner that, in his good faith medical judgment and based on the facts known to the physician at the time, provided the best opportunity for the unborn child to survive, unless, in his good faith medical judgment, termination of the pregnancy in that manner would have posed a greater risk of the death of the pregnant woman. No such greater risk shall be deemed to exist because the physician believes that the woman may or will take action to harm herself; or
(b)(i)  The abortion was performed or attempted by a physician as defined in this chapter;
(ii)  If the woman is not a minor or subject to a guardianship, then, prior to the performance of the abortion, the woman has reported the act of rape or incest to a law enforcement agency and provided a copy of such report to the physician who is to perform the abortion;
(iii) If the woman is a minor or subject to a guardianship, then, prior to the performance of the abortion, the woman or her parent or guardian has reported the act of rape or incest to a law enforcement agency or child protective services and a copy of such report has been provided to the physician who is to perform the abortion; and
(iv)  The physician who performed the abortion complied with the requirements of paragraph (a)(iii) of this subsection regarding the method of abortion.
(4)  Medical treatment provided to a pregnant woman by a health care professional as defined in this chapter that results in the accidental death of, or unintentional injury to, the unborn child shall not be a violation of this section.
(5)  Nothing in this section shall be construed to subject a pregnant woman on whom any abortion is performed or attempted to any criminal conviction and penalty.",
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Illinois,IL ST CH 775 § 55/1-25.,Abortion prohibited after viability unless the abortion is necessary to protect the life or health of the patient.,"Sec. 1-25. Reporting of abortions performed by health care professionals.
    (a) A health care professional may provide abortion care in accordance with the health care professional's professional judgment and training and based on accepted standards of clinical practice consistent with the scope of his or her practice under the Medical Practice Act of 1987, the Nurse Practice Act, or the Physician Assistant Practice Act of 1987. An advanced practice registered nurse or physician assistant as defined in this Act may perform aspiration abortion procedures that do not require general anesthesia, consistent with their training and standards of clinical practice and, if applicable, consistent with any collaborative agreement. If the health care professional determines that there is fetal viability, the health care professional may provide abortion care only if, in the professional judgment of the health care professional, the abortion is necessary to protect the life or health of the patient.
    (b) A report of each abortion performed by a health care professional shall be made to the Department on forms prescribed by it. Such reports shall be transmitted to the Department on a quarterly basis.
    (c) The abortion reporting forms prescribed by the Department shall not request or require information that identifies a patient or health care professional by name or any other identifying information, and the Department shall secure anonymity of all patients and health care professionals.
    (d) All reports received by the Department pursuant to this Section shall be treated as confidential and exempt from the Freedom of Information Act. Such reports shall not be admissible as evidence or discoverable in any action of any kind, in any court, or before any tribunal, board, agency or person. Access to such reports shall be limited to authorized Department staff who shall use the reports for statistical purposes only. Such reports must be destroyed within 2 years after date of receipt. The Department may make aggregate data derived from the reports publicly available so long as such disclosure does not reveal any identifying information about a patient or health care professional.",
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Indiana,IN ST 16-34-2-1.,Abortion prohibited at 20 weeks except to preserve life or health of the woman.,"(a) Abortion shall in all instances be a criminal act, except when performed under the following circumstances:
(1) Except as prohibited in IC 16-34-4, during the first trimester of pregnancy for reasons based upon the professional, medical judgment of the pregnant woman's physician if:
(A) the abortion is performed by the physician;
(B) the woman submitting to the abortion has filed her consent with her physician. However, if in the judgment of the physician the abortion is necessary to preserve the life of the woman, her consent is not required; and
(C) the woman submitting to the abortion has filed with her physician the written consent of her parent or legal guardian if required under section 4 of this chapter.
However, an abortion inducing drug may not be dispensed, prescribed, administered, or otherwise given to a pregnant woman after eight (8) weeks of postfertilization age. A physician must dispense the abortion inducing drug in person and have the pregnant woman consume the drug in the presence of the physician. A physician shall examine a pregnant woman in person before prescribing or dispensing an abortion inducing drug. The physician shall provide the pregnant woman with a copy of the manufacturer's instruction sheets and require that the pregnant woman sign the manufacturer's patient agreement form. A physician shall also provide, orally and in writing, along with other discharge information, the following statement: ""Some evidence suggests that the effects of Mifepristone may be avoided, ceased, or reversed if the second pill, Misoprostol, has not been taken. Immediately contact the following for more information at (insert applicable abortion inducing drug reversal Internet web site and corresponding hotline number)."" The physician shall retain a copy of the signed patient agreement form, and the signed physician's agreement form required by the manufacturer, in the patient's file. As used in this subdivision, ""in person"" does not include the use of telehealth or telemedicine services.

(2) Except as prohibited by IC 16-34-4, after the first trimester of pregnancy and before the earlier of viability of the fetus or twenty (20) weeks of postfertilization age, for reasons based upon the professional, medical judgment of the pregnant woman's physician if:
(A) all the circumstances and provisions required for legal abortion during the first trimester are present and adhered to; and
(B) the abortion is performed in a hospital or ambulatory outpatient surgical center (as defined in IC 16-18-2-14) .
(3) Except as provided in subsection (b) or as prohibited by IC 16-34-4, at the earlier of viability of the fetus or twenty (20) weeks of postfertilization age and any time after, for reasons based upon the professional, medical judgment of the pregnant woman's physician if:
(A) all the circumstances and provisions required for legal abortion before the earlier of viability of the fetus or twenty (20) weeks of postfertilization age are present and adhered to;
(B) the abortion is performed in compliance with section 3 of this chapter; and
(C) before the abortion the attending physician shall certify in writing to the hospital in which the abortion is to be performed, that in the attending physician's professional, medical judgment, after proper examination and review of the woman's history, the abortion is necessary to prevent a substantial permanent impairment of the life or physical health of the pregnant woman. All facts and reasons supporting the certification shall be set forth by the physician in writing and attached to the certificate.
(b) A person may not knowingly or intentionally perform a partial birth abortion unless a physician reasonably believes that:
(1) performing the partial birth abortion is necessary to save the mother's life; and
(2) no other medical procedure is sufficient to save the mother's life.
(c) A person may not knowingly or intentionally perform a dismemberment abortion unless reasonable medical judgment dictates that performing the dismemberment abortion is necessary:
(1) to prevent any serious health risk to the mother; or
(2) to save the mother's life.
(d) Telehealth and telemedicine may not be used to provide any abortion, including the writing or filling of a prescription for any purpose that is intended to result in an abortion.",
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Iowa,IA ST § 146C.2 ,Abortion prohibited after fetal heartbeat detectable.,"1. Except in the case of a medical emergency or when the abortion is medically necessary, a physician shall not perform an abortion unless the physician has first complied with the prerequisites of chapter 146A and has tested the pregnant woman as specified in this subsection, to determine if a fetal heartbeat is detectable.

a. In testing for a detectable fetal heartbeat, the physician shall perform an abdominal ultrasound, necessary to detect a fetal heartbeat according to standard medical practice and including the use of medical devices, as determined by standard medical practice and specified by rule of the board of medicine.

b. Following the testing of the pregnant woman for a detectable fetal heartbeat, the physician shall inform the pregnant woman, in writing, of all of the following:

(1) Whether a fetal heartbeat was detected.

(2) That if a fetal heartbeat was detected, an abortion is prohibited.

c. Upon receipt of the written information, the pregnant woman shall sign a form acknowledging that the pregnant woman has received the information as required under this subsection.

2. a. A physician shall not perform an abortion upon a pregnant woman when it has been determined that the unborn child has a detectable fetal heartbeat, unless, in the physician's reasonable medical judgment, a medical emergency exists, or when the abortion is medically necessary.

b. Notwithstanding paragraph “a”, if a physician determines that the probable postfertilization age, as defined in section 146B.1, of the unborn child is twenty or more weeks, the physician shall not perform an abortion upon a pregnant woman when it has been determined that the unborn child has a detectable fetal heartbeat, unless in the physician's reasonable medical judgment the pregnant woman has a condition which the physician deems a medical emergency, as defined in section 146B.1, or the abortion is necessary to preserve the life of an unborn child.

3. A physician shall retain in the woman's medical record all of the following:

a. Documentation of the testing for a fetal heartbeat as specified in subsection 1 and the results of the fetal heartbeat test.

b. The pregnant woman's signed form acknowledging that the pregnant woman received the information as required under subsection 1.

4. This section shall not be construed to impose civil or criminal liability on a woman upon whom an abortion is performed in violation of this section.

5. The board of medicine shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to administer this section.",
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Iowa, IA ST § 146B.2 ,Abortion prohibited after 20 weeks postfertilization except for medical emergency. ,"1. Except in the case of a medical emergency or when the abortion is medically necessary, a physician shall not perform an abortion unless the physician has first complied with the prerequisites of chapter 146A and has tested the pregnant woman as specified in this subsection, to determine if a fetal heartbeat is detectable.

a. In testing for a detectable fetal heartbeat, the physician shall perform an abdominal ultrasound, necessary to detect a fetal heartbeat according to standard medical practice and including the use of medical devices, as determined by standard medical practice and specified by rule of the board of medicine.

b. Following the testing of the pregnant woman for a detectable fetal heartbeat, the physician shall inform the pregnant woman, in writing, of all of the following:

(1) Whether a fetal heartbeat was detected.

(2) That if a fetal heartbeat was detected, an abortion is prohibited.

c. Upon receipt of the written information, the pregnant woman shall sign a form acknowledging that the pregnant woman has received the information as required under this subsection.

2. a. A physician shall not perform an abortion upon a pregnant woman when it has been determined that the unborn child has a detectable fetal heartbeat, unless, in the physician's reasonable medical judgment, a medical emergency exists, or when the abortion is medically necessary.

b. Notwithstanding paragraph “a”, if a physician determines that the probable postfertilization age, as defined in section 146B.1, of the unborn child is twenty or more weeks, the physician shall not perform an abortion upon a pregnant woman when it has been determined that the unborn child has a detectable fetal heartbeat, unless in the physician's reasonable medical judgment the pregnant woman has a condition which the physician deems a medical emergency, as defined in section 146B.1, or the abortion is necessary to preserve the life of an unborn child.

3. A physician shall retain in the woman's medical record all of the following:

a. Documentation of the testing for a fetal heartbeat as specified in subsection 1 and the results of the fetal heartbeat test.

b. The pregnant woman's signed form acknowledging that the pregnant woman received the information as required under subsection 1.

4. This section shall not be construed to impose civil or criminal liability on a woman upon whom an abortion is performed in violation of this section.

5. The board of medicine shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to administer this section.",
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Kansas, KS ST 65-6703(a),Abortion prohibited after viability except in cases of medical emergency.,"65-6703. Abortion when unborn child viable; restrictions and prohibitions; civil damages and criminal penalties for violations. (a) No person shall perform or induce, or attempt to perform or induce an abortion when the unborn child is viable unless such person is a physician and has a documented referral from another physician not legally or financially affiliated with the physician performing or inducing, or attempting to perform or induce the abortion and both physicians provide a written determination, based upon a medical judgment arrived at using and exercising that degree of care, skill and proficiency commonly exercised by the ordinary skillful, careful and prudent physician in the same or similar circumstances and that would be made by a reasonably prudent physician, knowledgeable in the field, and knowledgeable about the case and the treatment possibilities with respect to the conditions involved, that: (1) The abortion is necessary to preserve the life of the pregnant woman; or (2) a continuation of the pregnancy will cause a substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function of the pregnant woman. No condition shall be deemed to exist if it is based on a claim or diagnosis that the woman will engage in conduct that would result in her death or in substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function.",
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Kansas, KS ST 65-6723(f),Abortion prohibited after 22 weeks with exception for medical emergency,"a) ""Abortion"" means the use or prescription of any instrument, medicine, drug or any other substance or device to terminate the pregnancy of a woman known to be pregnant with an intention other than to increase the probability of a live birth, to preserve the life or health of the child after live birth, or to remove a dead unborn child who died as the result of natural causes in utero, accidental trauma or a criminal assault on the pregnant woman or her unborn child, and which causes the premature termination of the pregnancy.

(b) ""Bodily function"" means physical function. The term ""bodily function"" does not include mental or emotional functions.

(c) ""Department"" means the department of health and environment.

(d) ""Gestational age"" means the time that has elapsed since the first day of the woman's last menstrual period.

(e) ""Medical emergency"" means a condition that, in reasonable medical judgment, so complicates the medical condition of the pregnant woman as to necessitate the immediate abortion of her pregnancy to avert her death or for which a delay necessary to comply with the applicable statutory requirements will create serious risk of substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function. No condition shall be deemed a medical emergency if based on a claim or diagnosis that the woman will engage in conduct which would result in her death or in substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function.

(f) ""Pain-capable unborn child"" means an unborn child having reached the gestational age of 22 weeks or more.

(g) ""Physician"" means a person licensed to practice medicine and surgery in this state.

(h) ""Pregnant"" or ""pregnancy"" means that female reproductive condition of having an unborn child in the mother's body.",
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Kansas,KS ST 65-6724(a),Abortion prohibited after 22 weeks with exception for medical emergency,"65-6724. Same; certain abortions prohibited, exceptions; determination of gestational age; civil action; criminal penalties. (a) No person shall perform or induce, or attempt to perform or induce an abortion upon a pain-capable unborn child unless such person is a physician and has a documented referral from another physician not legally or financially affiliated with the physician performing or inducing, or attempting to perform or induce the abortion and both physicians provide a written determination, based upon a medical judgment arrived at using and exercising that degree of care, skill and proficiency commonly exercised by the ordinary skillful, careful and prudent physician in the same or similar circumstances and that would be made by a reasonably prudent physician, knowledgeable in the field, and knowledgeable about the case and the treatment possibilities with respect to the conditions involved, that: (1) The abortion is necessary to preserve the life of the pregnant woman; or (2) a continuation of the pregnancy will cause a substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function of the pregnant woman. No such condition shall be deemed to exist if it is based on a claim or diagnosis that the woman will engage in conduct which would result in her death or in substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function.",
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Kentucky, KY ST 311.772.,Abortion prohibited except to preserve life or health of mother; exception for sale or use of contraceptive medications and devices prior to the time when pregnancy could be determined if used in accordance with manufacturer directions.,"311.772 Prohibition against intentional termination of life of an unborn human being -- Definitions -- When section takes effect -- Penalties not to apply to pregnant woman -- Contraception -- Appropriation of Medicaid funds.
(1) As used in this section: (a) ""Fertilization"" means that point in time when a male human sperm penetrates the zona pellucida of a female human ovum; (b) ""Pregnant"" means the human female reproductive condition of having a living unborn human being within her body throughout the entire embryonic and fetal stages of the unborn child from fertilization to full gestation and
childbirth; and (c) ""Unborn human being"" means an individual living member of the species homo sapiens throughout the entire embryonic and fetal stages of the unborn child from fertilization to full gestation and childbirth.
(2) The provisions of this section shall become effective immediately upon, and to the extent permitted, by the occurrence of any of the following circumstances: (a) Any decision of the United States Supreme Court which reverses, in whole or in part, Roe v. Wade, 410 U.S. 113 (1973), thereby restoring to the Commonwealth of Kentucky the authority to prohibit abortion; or (b) Adoption of an amendment to the United States Constitution which, in whole or in part, restores to the Commonwealth of Kentucky the authority to prohibit
abortion. 
(3) (a) No person may knowingly: 1. Administer to, prescribe for, procure for, or sell to any pregnant woman any medicine, drug, or other substance with the specific intent of causing or abetting the termination of the life of an unborn human being; or 2. Use or employ any instrument or procedure upon a pregnant woman with the specific intent of causing or abetting the termination of the life of an unborn human being. (b) Any person who violates paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be guilty of a Class D felony.
(4) The following shall not be a violation of subsection (3) of this section: (a) For a licensed physician to perform a medical procedure necessary in reasonable medical judgment to prevent the death or substantial risk of death due to a physical condition, or to prevent the serious, permanent impairment of a life-sustaining organ of a pregnant woman. However, the physician shall make reasonable medical efforts under the circumstances to preserve both the life of the mother and the life of the unborn human being in a manner
consistent with reasonable medical practice; or (b) Medical treatment provided to the mother by a licensed physician which
results in the accidental or unintentional injury or death to the unborn human being.
(5) Nothing in this section may be construed to subject the pregnant mother upon  whom any abortion is performed or attempted to any criminal conviction and penalty.
(6) Nothing in this section may be construed to prohibit the sale, use, prescription, or administration of a contraceptive measure, drug, or chemical, if it is administered prior to the time when a pregnancy could be determined through conventional medical testing and if the contraceptive measure is sold, used, prescribed, or administered in accordance with manufacturer instructions.
(7) The provisions of this section shall be effective relative to the appropriation of Medicaid funds, to the extent consistent with any executive order by the President of the United States, federal statute, appropriation rider, or federal regulation that sets forth the limited circumstances in which states must fund abortion to remain eligible to receive federal Medicaid funds pursuant to 42 U.S.C. secs. 1396 et seq.",
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Kentucky, KY ST 311.7701-7711. ,Abortion prohibited after fetal heartbeat detectable.,"As used in KRS 311.7701 to 311.7711:
(1) ""Conception"" means fertilization;
(2) ""Contraceptive"" means a drug, device, or chemical that prevents conception;
(3) ""Fertilization"" has the same meaning as in KRS 311.781;
(4) ""Fetal heartbeat"" means cardiac activity or the steady and repetitive rhythmic contraction of the fetal heart within the gestational sac;
(5) ""Fetus"" means the human offspring developing during pregnancy from the moment of conception and includes the embryonic stage of development; 
(6) ""Frivolous conduct"" has the same meaning as in KRS 311.784;
(7) ""Gestational age"" means the age of an unborn human individual as calculated from the first day of the last menstrual period of a pregnant woman;
(8) ""Gestational sac"" means the structure that comprises the extraembryonic membranes that envelop the fetus and that is typically visible by ultrasound after the fourth week of pregnancy;
(9) ""Intrauterine pregnancy"" means a pregnancy in which the fetus is attached to the placenta within the uterus of the pregnant woman;
(10) ""Medical emergency"" has the same meaning as in KRS 311.781;
(11) ""Physician"" has the same meaning as in KRS 311.720;
(12) ""Pregnancy"" means the human female reproductive condition that begins with fertilization, when the woman is carrying the developing human offspring, and that is calculated from the first day of the last menstrual period of the woman;
(13) ""Serious risk of the substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function"" has the same meaning as in KRS 311.781;
(14) ""Spontaneous miscarriage"" means the natural or accidental termination of a pregnancy and the expulsion of the fetus, typically caused by genetic defects in the fetus or physical abnormalities in the pregnant woman;
(15) ""Standard medical practice"" means the degree of skill, care, and diligence that a physician of the same medical specialty would employ in like circumstances. As applied to the method used to determine the presence of a fetal heartbeat for purposes of KRS 311.7704, ""standard medical practice"" includes employing the appropriate means of detection depending on the estimated gestational age of the fetus and the condition of the woman and her pregnancy; and
(16) ""Unborn child"" and ""unborn human individual"" have the same meaning as
""unborn child"" has in KRS 311.781.",
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Kentucky,KY ST § 311.772,"Exceptions for medical emergencies 311.7705; extrauterine pregnancies, 311.7703; Drugs, devices, or chemicals for contraceptive purposes, 311.7708. ","""311.772 Prohibition against intentional termination of life of an unborn human being -- Definitions -- When section takes effect -- Penalties not to apply to pregnant woman -- Contraception -- Appropriation of Medicaid funds.
(1) As used in this section: (a) """"Fertilization"""" means that point in time when a male human sperm penetrates the zona pellucida of a female human ovum; (b) """"Pregnant"""" means the human female reproductive condition of having a living unborn human being within her body throughout the entire embryonic and fetal stages of the unborn child from fertilization to full gestation and
childbirth; and (c) """"Unborn human being"""" means an individual living member of the species homo sapiens throughout the entire embryonic and fetal stages of the unborn child from fertilization to full gestation and childbirth.
(2) The provisions of this section shall become effective immediately upon, and to the extent permitted, by the occurrence of any of the following circumstances: (a) Any decision of the United States Supreme Court which reverses, in whole or in part, Roe v. Wade, 410 U.S. 113 (1973), thereby restoring to the Commonwealth of Kentucky the authority to prohibit abortion; or (b) Adoption of an amendment to the United States Constitution which, in whole or in part, restores to the Commonwealth of Kentucky the authority to prohibit
abortion. 
(3) (a) No person may knowingly: 1. Administer to, prescribe for, procure for, or sell to any pregnant woman any medicine, drug, or other substance with the specific intent of causing or abetting the termination of the life of an unborn human being; or 2. Use or employ any instrument or procedure upon a pregnant woman with the specific intent of causing or abetting the termination of the life of an unborn human being. (b) Any person who violates paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be guilty of a Class D felony.
(4) The following shall not be a violation of subsection (3) of this section: (a) For a licensed physician to perform a medical procedure necessary in reasonable medical judgment to prevent the death or substantial risk of death due to a physical condition, or to prevent the serious, permanent impairment of a life-sustaining organ of a pregnant woman. However, the physician shall make reasonable medical efforts under the circumstances to preserve both the life of the mother and the life of the unborn human being in a manner
consistent with reasonable medical practice; or (b) Medical treatment provided to the mother by a licensed physician which
results in the accidental or unintentional injury or death to the unborn human being.
(5) Nothing in this section may be construed to subject the pregnant mother upon  whom any abortion is performed or attempted to any criminal conviction and penalty.
(6) Nothing in this section may be construed to prohibit the sale, use, prescription, or administration of a contraceptive measure, drug, or chemical, if it is administered prior to the time when a pregnancy could be determined through conventional medical testing and if the contraceptive measure is sold, used, prescribed, or administered in accordance with manufacturer instructions.
(7) The provisions of this section shall be effective relative to the appropriation of Medicaid funds, to the extent consistent with any executive order by the President of the United States, federal statute, appropriation rider, or federal regulation that sets forth the limited circumstances in which states must fund abortion to remain eligible to receive federal Medicaid funds pursuant to 42 U.S.C. secs. 1396 et seq.""",
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Louisiana,LA R.S. 40:1061,Abortion prohibited except to preserve life or health of pregnant woman,"§1061.1.3. Louisiana Unborn Child Protection from Dismemberment Abortion Act

            A. This Section shall be known and may be cited as the ""Louisiana Unborn Child Protection from Dismemberment Abortion Act"".

            B. Repealed by Acts 2022, No. 545, §4.

            C.(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, it shall be unlawful for any person to intentionally perform or attempt to perform a dismemberment abortion and thereby kill an unborn child unless necessary to prevent serious health risk to the unborn child's mother.

            (2) No woman upon whom an abortion is performed or attempted to be performed shall be thereby liable for performing or attempting to perform a dismemberment abortion. No nurse, technician, secretary, receptionist, or other employee or agent who is not a physician but who acts at the direction of a physician, and no pharmacist or other individual who is not a physician but who fills a prescription or provides instruments or materials used in an abortion at the direction of or to a physician shall be thereby liable for performing or attempting to perform a dismemberment abortion.

            D. Whoever violates the provisions of this Section shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars per incidence or occurrence, or imprisoned for not more than two years, or both. In addition to whatever remedies are otherwise available under the laws of this state, failure to comply with the provisions of this Section shall provide all of the following:

            (1) A basis for a cause of action for civil damages for injuries and wrongful death as more fully set forth in Civil Code Articles 2315.1 and 2315.2, whether or not the unborn child was viable at the time the abortion was performed, or was born alive, except that such causes of action shall be maintained only by the following persons:

            (a) The natural or biological father of the aborted infant or fetus, unless such father's criminal conduct caused the pregnancy.

            (b) The mother of the aborted infant or fetus, subject to the provisions of Subsection F of this Section.

            (c) The parents or guardian on behalf of the mother of the aborted infant or fetus if the mother was a minor at the time of the abortion, unless the parents or guardian consented to the dismemberment abortion.

            (2) A basis for professional disciplinary action under R.S. 37:1261 et seq.

            E.(1) A physician charged with an offense pursuant to this Section may seek a hearing before the Louisiana State Board of Medical Examiners on whether the physician's conduct was necessary to save the life of the mother whose life was endangered by a physical disorder, physical illness, or physical injury, including a life-endangering physical condition caused by or arising from the pregnancy itself.

            (2) The findings concerning the issue provided for in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection are admissible on that issue at the trial of the physician. Upon motion of the physician, the court shall delay the beginning of the trial for not more than thirty days to permit such hearing to take place; however, this delay may be extended for good cause.

            F. When requested, the court shall allow a woman to proceed using solely her initials or a pseudonym and may close any proceedings in the case and enter other protective orders to preserve the privacy of the woman upon whom the abortion was performed.

            G. Any person who is not a physician or not otherwise legally authorized by the state to perform abortions, but who nevertheless directly performs a dismemberment abortion, shall be subject to the provisions of this Section.

            H. Nothing in this Section shall be construed as creating or recognizing a right to abortion, or a right to a particular method of abortion.

            I. The provisions of R.S. 40:1061.1 shall apply to this Section.

            Acts 2016, No. 264, §1; Acts 2022, No. 545, §§3, 4, 6C; Redesignated from R.S. 40:1061.1.1.

            NOTE: Former R.S. 40:1061.1.3 redesignated as R.S. 40:1061.1.5 by Acts 2022, No. 545, §6C.
",
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Maine, 22 M.R.S.A. § 1598. ,Abortion prohibited after viability except to protect the life or health of the mother. Definition of abortion excludes procedures to remove a dead fetus,"§1598. Abortions
1.  Policy.  It is the public policy of the State that the State not restrict a woman's exercise of her private decision to terminate a pregnancy before viability except as provided in section 1597‑A. After viability an abortion may be performed only when it is necessary to preserve the life or health of the mother. It is also the public policy of the State that all abortions may be performed only by a health care professional, as defined in section 1596, subsection 1, paragraph C.  
[PL 2019, c. 262, §4 (AMD).]
2.  Definitions.  As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following terms shall have the following meanings.  
A. ""Abortion"" means the intentional interruption of a pregnancy by the application of external agents, whether chemical or physical or by the ingestion of chemical agents with an intention other than to produce a live birth or to remove a dead fetus.   [PL 1979, c. 405, §2 (NEW).]
B. ""Viability"" means the state of fetal development when the life of the fetus may be continued indefinitely outside the womb by natural or artificial life-supportive systems.   [PL 1979, c. 405, §2 (NEW).]
[PL 1979, c. 405, §2 (NEW).]
3.  Persons who may perform abortions; penalties.   
A. Only a person licensed under Title 32, chapter 36 or 48 to practice in the State as an osteopathic or medical physician or physician assistant or a person licensed under Title 32, chapter 31 to practice in the State as an advanced practice registered nurse may perform an abortion on another person.   [PL 2019, c. 262, §5 (AMD).]
B. Any person not so licensed who knowingly performs an abortion on another person or any person who knowingly assists a nonlicensed person to perform an abortion on another person is guilty of a Class C crime.   [PL 1979, c. 405, §2 (NEW).]
[PL 2019, c. 262, §5 (AMD).]
4.  Abortions after viability; criminal liability.  A person who performs an abortion after viability is guilty of a Class D crime if:  
A. The person knowingly disregarded the viability of the fetus; and   [RR 2021, c. 2, Pt. B, §98 (COR).]
B. The person knew that the abortion was not necessary for the preservation of the life or health of the mother.   [RR 2021, c. 2, Pt. B, §98 (COR).]",https://legislature.maine.gov/statutes/22/title22sec1598.html
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,"Maryland",MD Health Gen § 20-209. ,"No restrictions. Affirmative protection for abortions prior to viability, procedures to protect the life or health of the women, and abortion of fetuses affected by certain genetic defects or serious deformities or abnormalities.","§20–209.

    (a)    In this section, “viable” means that stage when, in the best clinical judgment of the qualified provider based on the particular facts of the case before the qualified provider, there is a reasonable likelihood of the fetus’s sustained survival outside the womb.

    (b)    Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, the State may not interfere with the decision of a woman to terminate a pregnancy:

        (1)    Before the fetus is viable; or

        (2)    At any time during the woman’s pregnancy, if:

            (i)    The termination procedure is necessary to protect the life or health of the woman; or

            (ii)    The fetus is affected by genetic defect or serious deformity or abnormality.

    (c)    The Department may adopt regulations that:

        (1)    Are both necessary and the least intrusive method to protect the life or health of the woman; and

        (2)    Are not inconsistent with established clinical practice.

    (d)    The qualified provider is not liable for civil damages or subject to a criminal penalty for a decision to perform an abortion under this section made in good faith and in the qualified provider’s best clinical judgment in accordance with accepted standards of clinical practice.",https://mgaleg.maryland.gov/mgawebsite/Laws/StatuteText?article=ghg&section=20-209&enactments=false
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Massachusetts, MA ST 112 § 12N. ,"Abortion prohibited at 24 weeks except to preserve life, physical or mental health; or in cases of lethal fetal anomaly","If a pregnancy has existed for 24 weeks or more, no abortion may be performed except by a physician, and only if in the best medical judgement of the physician it is: (i) necessary to preserve the life of the patient; (ii) necessary to preserve the patient’s physical or mental health; (iii) warranted because of a lethal fetal anomaly or diagnosis; or (iv) warranted because of a grave fetal diagnosis that indicates that the fetus is incompatible with sustained life outside of the uterus without extraordinary medical interventions","https://www.mass.gov/info-details/mass-general-laws-c112-ss-12n#:~:text=If%20a%20pregnancy%20has%20existed,iii)%20warranted%20because%20of%20a"
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Michigan, MI ST 750.323.,Abortion prohibited after viability. ,"750.323 Manslaughter; death of quick child or mother from use of medicine or instrument.
Sec. 323.

Death of quick child or mother from use of medicine, etc., with intent to destroy such child—Any person who shall administer to any woman pregnant with a quick child any medicine, drug or substance whatever, or shall use or employ any instrument or other means, with intent thereby to destroy such child, unless the same shall have been necessary to preserve the life of such mother, shall, in case the death of such child or of such mother be thereby produced, be guilty of manslaughter. In any prosecution under this section, it shall not be necessary for the prosecution to prove that no such necessity existed.",http://www.legislature.mi.gov/(S(xkg0lqkpbzou12gbimekjrdz))/mileg.aspx?page=GetObject&objectname=mcl-750-323
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Michigan,MI ST 750.14," Pre Roe ban currently subject to TRO from Oakland County judge, dated August 1, 2022","***** 750.14 THIS SECTION IS REPEALED BY ACT 11 OF 2023 EFFECTIVE 91 DAYS AFTER ADJOURNMENT OF THE 2023 REGULAR SESSION SINE DIE *****
750.14 Miscarriage; administering with intent to procure; felony, penalty.
Sec. 14.

   Administering drugs, etc., with intent to procure miscarriage—Any person who shall wilfully administer to any pregnant woman any medicine, drug, substance or thing whatever, or shall employ any instrument or other means whatever, with intent thereby to procure the miscarriage of any such woman, unless the same shall have been necessary to preserve the life of such woman, shall be guilty of a felony, and in case the death of such pregnant woman be thereby produced, the offense shall be deemed manslaughter.
   In any prosecution under this section, it shall not be necessary for the prosecution to prove that no such necessity existed.",http://www.legislature.mi.gov/(S(uvezk2bfrkvwtplgkdiiii3c))/mileg.aspx?page=getobject&objectname=mcl-750-14
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Minnesota,MN ST 145.412. ,Abortions prohibited after viability,"145.412 CRIMINAL ACTS.
Subdivision 1.Requirements. It shall be unlawful to willfully perform an abortion unless the abortion is performed:
(1) by a physician licensed to practice medicine pursuant to chapter 147, or a physician in training under the supervision of a licensed physician;

(2) in a hospital or abortion facility if the abortion is performed after the first trimester;

(3) in a manner consistent with the lawful rules promulgated by the state commissioner of health; and

(4) with the consent of the woman submitting to the abortion after a full explanation of the procedure and effect of the abortion.

Subd. 2.Unconsciousness; lifesaving. It shall be unlawful to perform an abortion upon a woman who is unconscious except if the woman has been rendered unconscious for the purpose of having an abortion or if the abortion is necessary to save the life of the woman.

Subd. 3.Viability. It shall be unlawful to perform an abortion when the fetus is potentially viable unless:
(1) the abortion is performed in a hospital;

(2) the attending physician certifies in writing that in the physician's best medical judgment the abortion is necessary to preserve the life or health of the pregnant woman; and

(3) to the extent consistent with sound medical practice the abortion is performed under circumstances which will reasonably assure the live birth and survival of the fetus.

§Subd. 4.Penalty. A person who performs an abortion in violation of this section is guilty of a felony.",https://www.revisor.mn.gov/statutes/cite/145.412
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Mississippi, MS ST § 41-41-45,"Abortion prohibited except to preserve life of the mother, or where the pregnancy was caused by rape","AN ACT TO AMEND SECTION 41-41-55, MISSISSIPPI CODE OF 1972, TO PROVIDE THAT IF A COURT GRANTS A WAIVER OF PARENTAL CONSENT TO A MINOR SEEKING AN ABORTION, THE COURT SHALL MAKE CERTAIN REQUIRED FINDINGS BY CLEAR AND CONVINCING EVIDENCE; TO PROHIBIT ABORTIONS IN THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI, EXCEPT IN CASES WHERE NECESSARY FOR THE PRESERVATION OF THE MOTHER'S LIFE OR WHERE THE PREGNANCY WAS CAUSED BY RAPE; TO PROVIDE THAT THIS PROHIBITION SHALL BECOME EFFECTIVE ONLY UPON A DETERMINATION BY THE STATE ATTORNEY GENERAL THAT THE UNITED STATES SUPREME COURT HAS OVERRULED THE DECISION OF ROE V. WADE, WHICH HAS THE EFFECT OF HOLDING UNCONSTITUTIONAL ANY STATE LAW THAT SEEKS TO CREATE SUCH A PROHIBITION; TO REQUIRE THAT BEFORE THE PERFORMANCE OF AN ABORTION, THE PHYSICIAN SHALL PERFORM FETAL ULTRASOUND IMAGING AND AUSCULTATION OF FETAL HEART TONE SERVICES; TO REQUIRE THE PHYSICIAN TO OFFER THE PATIENT AN OPPORTUNITY TO VIEW THE ULTRASOUND IMAGE AND LISTEN TO THE HEARTBEAT OF THE UNBORN CHILD, IF THE HEARTBEAT IS AUDIBLE; TO REQUIRE THE PATIENT TO SIGN A CERTIFICATION FORM STATING THAT SHE HAS BEEN GIVEN THAT OPPORTUNITY; TO REQUIRE THE PHYSICIAN TO RETAIN A COPY OF THE SIGNED CERTIFICATION FORM IN THE PATIENT'S MEDICAL RECORD; AND FOR RELATED PURPOSES.

     BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI:

     SECTION 1.  Section 41-41-55, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows:

     41-41-55.  (1)  The requirements and procedures under Sections 41-41-51 through 41-41-63 shall apply and are available to minors whether or not they are residents of this state.

     (2)  The minor may participate in proceedings in the court on her own behalf.  The court shall advise her that she has a right to court-appointed counsel and shall provide her with such counsel upon her request or if she is not already adequately represented.

     (3)  Court proceedings under this section shall be confidential and anonymous and shall be given such precedence over other pending matters as is necessary to insure that the court may reach a decision promptly, but in no case shall the court fail to rule within seventy-two (72) hours of the time the application is filed.  If for any reason the court fails to rule within seventy-two (72) hours of the time the application is filed, the minor may proceed as if the consent requirement of Section 41-41-53 has been waived.

     (4)  Consent shall be waived if the court finds by clear and convincing evidence either:

          (a)  That the minor is mature and well-informed enough to make the abortion decision on her own; or

          (b)  That performance of the abortion would be in the best interests of the minor.

     (5)  A court that conducts proceedings under this section shall issue written and specific factual findings and legal conclusions supporting its decision and shall order that a confidential record of the evidence be maintained.

     (6)  An expedited confidential and anonymous appeal shall be available to any minor to whom the court denies a waiver of consent.  The Mississippi Supreme Court shall issue promptly such rules and regulations as are necessary to insure that proceedings under Sections 41-41-51 through 41-41-63 are handled in an expeditious, confidential and anonymous manner.

     (7)  No filing fees shall be required of any minor who avails herself of the procedures provided by this section.

     SECTION 2.  (1)  As used in this section, the term ""abortion"" means the use or prescription of any instrument, medicine, drug or any other substance or device to terminate the pregnancy of a woman known to be pregnant with an intention other than to increase the probability of a live birth, to preserve the life or health of the child after live birth or to remove a dead fetus.

     (2)  No abortion shall be performed or induced in the State of Mississippi, except in the case where necessary for the preservation of the mother's life or where the pregnancy was caused by rape.

     (3)  For the purposes of this act, rape shall be an exception to the prohibition for an abortion only if a formal charge of rape has been filed with an appropriate law enforcement official.

     (4)  Any person, except the pregnant woman, who purposefully, knowingly or recklessly performs or attempts to perform or induce an abortion in the State of Mississippi, except in the case where necessary for the preservation of the mother's life or where the pregnancy was caused by rape, upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections for not less than one (1) year nor more than ten (10) years.

     SECTION 3.  The provisions of this section shall be codified as Section 41-41-34, Mississippi Code of 1972:

     41-41-34.  (1)  Before the performance of an abortion, as defined in Section 2 of this act, the physician who is to perform the abortion, or a qualified person assisting the physician, shall:

          (a)  Perform fetal ultrasound imaging and auscultation of fetal heart tone services on the patient undergoing the abortion;

          (b)  Offer to provide the patient with an opportunity to view the active ultrasound image of the unborn child and hear the heartbeat of the unborn child if the heartbeat is audible;

          (c)  Offer to provide the patient with a physical picture of the ultrasound image of the unborn child;

          (d)  Obtain the patient's signature on a certification form stating that the patient has been given the opportunity to view the active ultrasound image and hear the heartbeat of the unborn child if the heartbeat is audible, and that she has been offered a physical picture of the ultrasound image; and

          (e)  Retain a copy of the signed certification form in the patient's medical record.

     (2)  The State Department of Health shall enforce the requirements of this section.

     (3)  An ultrasound image must be of a quality consistent with standard medical practice in the community, shall contain the dimensions of the unborn child and shall accurately portray the presence of external members and internal organs, if present or viewable, of the unborn child.

     SECTION 4.  At such time as the Attorney General of Mississippi determines that the United States Supreme Court has overruled the decision of Roe v. Wade, 410 U.S. 113 (1973), and that as a result, it is reasonably probable that Section 2 of this act would be upheld by the court as constitutional, the Attorney General shall publish his determination of that fact in the administrative bulletin published by the Secretary of State as provided in Section 25-43-2.101, Mississippi Code of 1972.

     SECTION 5.  (1)  If any provision of this act is found to be unconstitutional, the provision is severable; and the other provisions of this act remain effective, except as provided in other sections of this act.

     (2)  Nothing in this act may be construed to repeal, by implication or otherwise, any provision not explicitly repealed.

     (3)  If any provision of this act is ever declared unconstitutional or its enforcement temporarily or permanently restricted or enjoined by judicial order, the provisions of  Sections 41-41-31 through 41-41-91, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall be enforced.  However, if such temporary or permanent restraining order or injunction is subsequently stayed or dissolved or such declaration vacated or any similar court order otherwise ceases to have effect, all provisions of this act that are not declared unconstitutional or whose enforcement is not restrained shall have full force and effect.

     (4)  Nothing in the provisions of Sections 41-41-31 through 41-41-91, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall be construed to permit any action that is prohibited by Senate Bill No. 2391, 2007 Regular Session, and to the extent that any provision of Sections 41-41-31 through 41-41-91, Mississippi Code of 1972, would be so construed, then the provisions of Senate Bill No. 2391, 2007 Regular Session, shall take precedence.

     SECTION 6.  Sections 1, 3, 4 and 5 of this act shall take effect from and after July 1, 2007.  Section 2 of this act shall take effect and be in force from and after ten (10) days following the date of publication by the Attorney General of Mississippi in the administrative bulletin published by the Secretary of State as provided in Section 25-43-2.101, Mississippi Code of 1972, that the Attorney General has determined that the United States Supreme Court has overruled the decision of Roe v. Wade, 410 U.S. 113 (1973), and that it is reasonably probable that Section 2 of this act would be upheld by the court as constitutional.",http://billstatus.ls.state.ms.us/documents/2007/html/SB/2300-2399/SB2391SG.htm
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Missouri, MO STAT 188.017,Abortion prohibited except in cases of medical emergency," 188.017.  Right to Life of the Unborn Child Act — limitation on abortions, when — affirmative defense — contingent effective date. — 1.  This section shall be known and may be cited as the ""Right to Life of the Unborn Child Act"".

  2.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no abortion shall be performed or induced upon a woman, except in cases of medical emergency.  Any person who knowingly performs or induces an abortion of an unborn child in violation of this subsection shall be guilty of a class B felony, as well as subject to suspension or revocation of his or her professional license by his or her professional licensing board.  A woman upon whom an abortion is performed or induced in violation of this subsection shall not be prosecuted for a conspiracy to violate the provisions of this subsection.

  3.  It shall be an affirmative defense for any person alleged to have violated the provisions of subsection 2 of this section that the person performed or induced an abortion because of a medical emergency.  The defendant shall have the burden of persuasion that the defense is more probably true than not.

  *4.  The enactment of this section shall only become effective upon notification to the revisor of statutes by an opinion by the attorney general of Missouri, a proclamation by the governor of Missouri, or the adoption of a concurrent resolution by the Missouri general assembly that:

  (1)  The United States Supreme Court has overruled, in whole or in part, Roe v. Wade, 410 U.S. 113 (1973), restoring or granting to the state of Missouri the authority to regulate abortion to the extent set forth in this section, and that as a result, it is reasonably probable that this section would be upheld by the court as constitutional;

  (2)  An amendment to the Constitution of the United States has been adopted that has the effect of restoring or granting to the state of Missouri the authority to regulate abortion to the extent set forth in this section; or

  (3)  The United States Congress has enacted a law that has the effect of restoring or granting to the state of Missouri the authority to regulate abortion to the extent set forth in this section.

­­--------

(L. 2019 H.B. 126 §188.017, § B)

*Effective 6-24-22",https://revisor.mo.gov/main/OneSection.aspx?section=188.017
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Montana,MT ST 50-20-603,Abortion prohibited after 20 weeks except in cases of medical emergency.,"50-20-603. Protection of unborn child capable of feeling pain from abortion. (1) (a) A person may not perform or attempt to perform an abortion of an unborn child capable of feeling pain unless it is necessary to prevent a serious health risk to the unborn child's mother.

(b) For the purposes of this subsection (1), an unborn child is capable of feeling pain when it has been determined by the medical practitioner performing or attempting the abortion or by another medical practitioner on whose determination the medical practitioner relies that the probable gestational age of the unborn child is 20 or more weeks.

(2) Except in the case of a medical emergency, an abortion may not be performed or attempted unless the medical practitioner has first made a determination of the probable gestational age of the unborn child or relied on a determination made by another medical practitioner. In making this determination, the medical practitioner shall make inquiries of the woman and perform or cause to be performed medical examinations and tests that a reasonably prudent practitioner who is knowledgeable about the case and the medical conditions involved would consider necessary to perform in making an accurate diagnosis with respect to gestational age.

(3) When an abortion of an unborn child capable of feeling pain is necessary to prevent a serious health risk to the unborn child's mother, the medical practitioner shall terminate the pregnancy in the manner that, in reasonable medical judgment, provides the best opportunity for the unborn child to survive unless, in reasonable medical judgment, termination of the pregnancy in that manner would pose a greater risk either of the death of the pregnant woman or of the substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function, not including psychological or emotional conditions, of the woman than would other available methods. No greater risk may be determined to exist if it is based on a claim or diagnosis that the woman will engage in conduct that the woman intends to result in the woman's death or in substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function.",https://leg.mt.gov/bills/mca/title_0500/chapter_0200/part_0060/section_0030/0500-0200-0060-0030.html
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Nebraska,"NE ST 28-3,106.",Abortion prohibited after 20 weeks except to preserve life or health of the woman or to save the life of an unborn child,"Abortion; performance; restrictions.
No person shall perform or induce or attempt to perform or induce an abortion upon a woman when it has been determined, by the physician performing or inducing the abortion or by another physician upon whose determination that physician relies, that the probable postfertilization age of the woman's unborn child is twenty or more weeks unless, in reasonable medical judgment (1) she has a condition which so complicates her medical condition as to necessitate the abortion of her pregnancy to avert her death or to avert serious risk of substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function or (2) it is necessary to preserve the life of an unborn child. No such condition shall be deemed to exist if it is based on a claim or diagnosis that the woman will engage in conduct which would result in her death or in substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function. In such a case, the physician shall terminate the pregnancy in the manner which, in reasonable medical judgment, provides the best opportunity for the unborn child to survive, unless, in reasonable medical judgment, termination of the pregnancy in that manner would pose a greater risk either of the death of the pregnant woman or of the substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function of the woman than would another available method. No such greater risk shall be deemed to exist if it is based on a claim or diagnosis that the woman will engage in conduct which would result in her death or in substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function.","https://nebraskalegislature.gov/laws/statutes.php?statute=28-3,106"
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Nebraska, NE ST 28-329. ,Abortion prohibited after viability,"Abortion; when not to be performed.
No abortion shall be performed after the time at which, in the sound medical judgment of the attending physician, the unborn child clearly appears to have reached viability, except when necessary to preserve the life or health of the mother.",https://nebraskalegislature.gov/laws/statutes.php?statute=28-329
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Nevada, NV ST 442.250.,Abortions prohibited after 24 weeks except to preserve life or health of the woman," NRS 442.250  Conditions under which abortion permitted. [NRS 442.250 was submitted to and approved by referendum at the 1990 general election and therefore is not subject to legislative amendment or repeal.]

      1.  No abortion may be performed in this state unless the abortion is performed:

      (a) By a physician licensed to practice in this state or by a physician in the employ of the government of the United States who:

             (1) Exercises his or her best clinical judgment in the light of all attendant circumstances including the accepted professional standards of medical practice in determining whether to perform an abortion; and

             (2) Performs the abortion in a manner consistent with accepted medical practices and procedures in the community.

      (b) Within 24 weeks after the commencement of the pregnancy.

      (c) After the 24th week of pregnancy only if the physician has reasonable cause to believe that an abortion currently is necessary to preserve the life or health of the pregnant woman.

      2.  All abortions performed after the 24th week of pregnancy or performed when, in the judgment of the attending physician, there is a reasonable likelihood of the sustained survival of the fetus outside of the womb by natural or artificial supportive systems must be performed in a hospital licensed under chapter 449 of NRS.

      3.  Before performing an abortion pursuant to subsection 2, the attending physician shall enter in the permanent records of the patient the facts on which the physician based his or her best clinical judgment that there is a substantial risk that continuance of the pregnancy would endanger the life of the patient or would gravely impair the physical or mental health of the patient.",https://www.leg.state.nv.us/nrs/nrs-442.html#NRS442Sec250 
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,"New Hampshire
",NH ST § 329:44 ,Abortions prohibited after 24 weeks except to preserve life or health of the woman or in cases of fetal abnormality incompatible with life,"329:44 Prohibition. –
I. Except in the case of a medical emergency as specifically defined in paragraph III, no abortion shall be performed, induced, or attempted by any health care provider unless a health care provider has first made a determination of the probable gestational age of the fetus. In making such a determination, the health care provider shall make such inquiries of the pregnant woman and perform or cause to be performed all such medical examinations, imaging studies, and tests as a reasonably prudent health care provider in the community, knowledgeable about the medical facts and conditions of both the woman and the fetus involved, would consider necessary to perform and consider in making an accurate diagnosis with respect to gestational age, provided, however, that the health care provider shall conduct an obstetric ultrasound examination of the patient for the purpose of making the determination. This paragraph shall be construed to require the performance of an ultrasound only if the provider either knows that the fetus has a gestational age of at least 24 weeks or is conscious of a substantial risk that the fetus has a gestational age of at least 24 weeks.
II. Except in the case of fetal abnormalities incompatible with life, or a medical emergency as specifically defined in paragraph III, no health care provider shall knowingly perform, induce, or attempt to perform an abortion upon a pregnant woman when the probable gestational age of her fetus has been determined to be at least 24 weeks or in the absence of a determination by a health care provider pursuant to paragraph I as to the fetus' probable gestational age.
III. For the purposes of this subdivision only, "" medical emergency "" means a condition in which an abortion is necessary to preserve the life of the pregnant woman whose life is endangered by a physical disorder, physical illness, or physical injury, including a life-endangering physical condition caused by or arising from the pregnancy itself, or when continuation of the pregnancy will create a serious risk of substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function, as defined in RSA 329:43, V, of the pregnant woman.",https://www.gencourt.state.nh.us/rsa/html/XXX/329/329-44.htm
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,New Jersey,,No restrictions.,,
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,New Mexico,,No restrictions.,,
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,New York, NY PUB HEALTH § 2599-bb.,Abortions prohibited after 24 weeks except to preserve life or health of the patient or in the absence of fetal viability,"§ 2599-bb. Abortion. 1. A health care practitioner licensed, certified, or authorized under title eight of the education law, acting
within his or her lawful scope of practice, may perform an abortion when, according to the practitioner's reasonable and good faith
professional judgment based on the facts of the patient's case: the patient is within twenty-four weeks from the commencement of pregnancy,
or there is an absence of fetal viability, or the abortion is necessary to protect the patient's life or health.

2. This article shall be construed and applied consistent with and subject to applicable laws and applicable and authorized regulations governing health care procedures.",https://www.nysenate.gov/legislation/laws/PBH/2599-BB
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,North Carolina,https://www.ncleg.net/enactedlegislation/statutes/html/bysection/chapter_14/gs_14-45.1.html,"Abortion prohibited after 20 weeks except in cases of medical emergency. . The 20-week ban has been held unconstitutional by Bryant v. Woodall, 363 F. Supp.3d 611 (MDNC 2019). ","§ 14-45.1.  When abortion not unlawful.

(a)        Notwithstanding any of the provisions of G.S. 14-44 and 14-45, it shall not be unlawful, during the first 20 weeks of a woman's pregnancy, to advise, procure, or cause a miscarriage or abortion when the procedure is performed by a qualified physician licensed to practice medicine in North Carolina in a hospital or clinic certified by the Department of Health and Human Services to be a suitable facility for the performance of abortions.

(a1)      The Department of Health and Human Services shall annually inspect any clinic, including ambulatory surgical facilities, where abortions are performed. The Department of Health and Human Services shall publish on the Department's Web site and on the State Web site established under G.S. 90-21.84 the results and findings of all inspections conducted on or after January 1, 2013, of clinics, including ambulatory surgical facilities, where abortions are performed, including any statement of deficiencies and any notice of administrative action resulting from the inspection. No person who is less than 18 years of age shall be employed at any clinic, including ambulatory surgical facilities, where abortions are performed. The requirements of this subsection shall not apply to a hospital required to be licensed under Chapter 131E of the General Statutes.

(b)        Notwithstanding any of the provisions of G.S. 14-44 and 14-45, it shall not be unlawful, after the twentieth week of a woman's pregnancy, to advise, procure or cause a miscarriage or abortion when the procedure is performed by a qualified physician licensed to practice medicine in North Carolina in a hospital licensed by the Department of Health and Human Services, if there is a medical emergency as defined by G.S. 90-21.81(5).

(b1)      A qualified physician who advises, procures, or causes a miscarriage or abortion after the sixteenth week of a woman's pregnancy shall record all of the following: the method used by the qualified physician to determine the probable gestational age of the unborn child at the time the procedure is to be performed; the results of the methodology, including the measurements of the unborn child; and an ultrasound image of the unborn child that depicts the measurements. The qualified physician shall provide this information, including the ultrasound image, to the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to G.S. 14-45.1(c).

A qualified physician who procures or causes a miscarriage or abortion after the twentieth week of a woman's pregnancy shall record the findings and analysis on which the qualified physician based the determination that there existed a medical emergency as defined by G.S. 90-21.81(5) and shall provide that information to the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to G.S. 14-45.1(c). Materials generated by the physician or provided by the physician to the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to this section shall not be public records under G.S. 132-1.

The information provided under this subsection shall be for statistical purposes only, and the confidentiality of the patient and the physician shall be protected. It is the duty of the qualified physician to submit information to the Department of Health and Human Services that omits identifying information of the patient and complies with Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (HIPAA).

(c)        The Department of Health and Human Services shall prescribe and collect on an annual basis, from hospitals or clinics, including ambulatory surgical facilities, where abortions are performed, statistical summary reports concerning the medical and demographic characteristics of the abortions provided for in this section, including the information described in subsection (b1) of this section as it shall deem to be in the public interest. Hospitals or clinics where abortions are performed shall be responsible for providing these statistical summary reports to the Department of Health and Human Services. The reports shall be for statistical purposes only and the confidentiality of the patient relationship shall be protected. Materials generated by the physician or provided by the physician to the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to this section shall not be public records under G.S. 132-1.

(d)       The requirements of G.S. 130A-114 are not applicable to abortions performed pursuant to this section.

(e)        No physician, nurse, or any other health care provider who shall state an objection to abortion on moral, ethical, or religious grounds shall be required to perform or participate in medical procedures which result in an abortion. The refusal of a physician, nurse, or health care provider to perform or participate in these medical procedures shall not be a basis for damages for the refusal, or for any disciplinary or any other recriminatory action against the physician, nurse, or health care provider. For purposes of this section, the phrase ""health care provider"" shall have the same meaning as defined under G.S. 90-410(1).

(f)        Nothing in this section shall require a hospital, other health care institution, or other health care provider to perform an abortion or to provide abortion services.

(g)        For purposes of this section, ""qualified physician"" means (i) a physician who possesses, or is eligible to possess, board certification in obstetrics or gynecology, (ii) a physician who possesses sufficient training based on established medical standards in safe abortion care, abortion complications, and miscarriage management, or (iii) a physician who performs an abortion in a medical emergency as defined by G.S. 90-21.81(5).  (1967, c. 367, s. 2; 1971, c. 383, ss. 1, 11/2; 1973, c. 139; c. 476, s. 128; c. 711; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 2013-366, ss. 1(a), (b); 2015-62, s. 7(a).)",https://www.ncleg.net/enactedlegislation/statutes/html/bysection/chapter_14/gs_14-45.1.html
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,North Carolina, NC ST § 90-21.121.,Sex-selective abortions prohibited.,"§ 90-21.121. Sex-selective abortion prohibited.
(a) Notwithstanding any of the provisions of G.S. 14-45.1, no person shall perform or
attempt to perform an abortion upon a woman in this State with knowledge, or an objective
reason to know, that a significant factor in the woman seeking the abortion is related to the sex
of the unborn child.
(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed as placing an affirmative duty on a
physician to inquire as to whether the sex of the unborn child is a significant factor in the
pregnant woman seeking the abortion. (2013-366, s. 3(a).)",https://www.ncleg.gov/enactedlegislation/statutes/pdf/bysection/chapter_90/gs_90-21.121.pdf
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,North Dakota, ND ST 12.1-31-12.,Abortions prohibited except to prevent the death of a pregnant female or in cases of rape or incest.,"12.1-31-12. Abortion - Affirmative defenses.
1. As used in this section: a. ""Abortion"" means the use or prescription of any substance, device, instrument, medicine, or drug to intentionally terminate the pregnancy of an individual known
to be pregnant. The term does not include an act made with the intent to increase the probability of a live birth; preserve the life or health of a child after live birth; or
remove a dead, unborn child who died as a result of a spontaneous miscarriage, an accidental trauma, or a criminal assault upon the pregnant female or her
unborn child.
b. ""Physician"" means an individual licensed to practice medicine under chapter 43-17.
c. ""Professional judgment"" means a medical judgment that would be made by a reasonably prudent physician who is knowledgeable about the case and the treatment possibilities with respect to the medical conditions involved.
2. It is a class C felony for a person, other than the pregnant female upon whom the abortion was performed, to perform an abortion.
3. The following are affirmative defenses under this section:
a. That the abortion was necessary in professional judgment and was intended to prevent the death of the pregnant female.
b. That the abortion was to terminate a pregnancy that resulted from gross sexual imposition, sexual imposition, sexual abuse of a ward, or incest, as those offenses are defined in chapter 12.1-20.
c. That the individual was acting within the scope of that individual's regulated profession and under the direction of or at the direction of a physician.",https://ndlegis.gov/cencode/t12-1c31.pdf
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Ohio,OH ST § 2919.195.,Abortion prohibited after fetal heartbeat detectable except to preserve life or health of the pregnant woman,"(A) Except as provided in division (B) of this section, no person shall knowingly and purposefully perform or induce an abortion on a pregnant woman with the specific intent of causing or abetting the termination of the life of the unborn human individual the pregnant woman is carrying and whose fetal heartbeat has been detected in accordance with division (A) of section 2919.192 of the Revised Code.

Whoever violates this division is guilty of performing or inducing an abortion after the detection of a fetal heartbeat, a felony of the fifth degree.

(B) Division (A) of this section does not apply to a physician who performs a medical procedure that, in the physician's reasonable medical judgment, is designed or intended to prevent the death of the pregnant woman or to prevent a serious risk of the substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function of the pregnant woman.

A physician who performs a medical procedure as described in this division shall declare, in a written document, that the medical procedure is necessary, to the best of the physician's reasonable medical judgment, to prevent the death of the pregnant woman or to prevent a serious risk of the substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function of the pregnant woman. In the document, the physician shall specify the pregnant woman's medical condition that the medical procedure is asserted to address and the medical rationale for the physician's conclusion that the medical procedure is necessary to prevent the death of the pregnant woman or to prevent a serious risk of the substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function of the pregnant woman.

A physician who performs a medical procedure as described in this division shall place the written document required by this division in the pregnant woman's medical records. The physician shall maintain a copy of the document in the physician's own records for at least seven years from the date the document is created.

(C) A person is not in violation of division (A) of this section if the person acts in accordance with division (A) of section 2919.192 of the Revised Code and the method used to determine the presence of a fetal heartbeat does not reveal a fetal heartbeat.

(D) Division (A) of this section does not have the effect of repealing or limiting any other provision of the Revised Code that restricts or regulates the performance or inducement of an abortion by a particular method or during a particular stage of a pregnancy.",https://codes.ohio.gov/ohio-revised-code/section-2919.195
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Oklahoma,OK ST T. 63 § 1-745.1-4,"Abortion prohibited after fetal heartbeat detectable, except in cases of medical emergency","§63-1-745.1. Pain-Capable Unborn Child Protection Act.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Pain-Capable Unborn Child Protection Act”.
Added by Laws 2011, c. 89, § 1, eff. Nov. 1, 2011.
§63-1-745.2. Definitions.
As used in the Pain-Capable Unborn Child Protection Act only:
1. “Abortion” means the use or prescription of any instrument, medicine, drug, or any other substance or device to terminate the
pregnancy of a woman known to be pregnant with an intention other than to increase the probability of a live birth, to preserve the life or health of the child after live birth, or to remove a dead unborn child who died as the result of natural causes in utero, accidental trauma, or a criminal assault on the pregnant woman or her unborn child, and which causes the premature termination of the pregnancy.
2. “Attempt to perform or induce an abortion” means an act, or an omission of a statutorily required act, that, under the circumstances as the actor believes them to be, constitutes a substantial step in a course of conduct planned to culminate in the performance or induction of an abortion in this state in violation of the Pain-Capable Unborn Child Protection Act;
3. “Postfertilization age” means the age of the unborn child as calculated from the fertilization of the human ovum;
4. “Fertilization” means the fusion of a human spermatozoon with a human ovum;
5. “Medical emergency” means a condition that, in reasonable medical judgment, so complicates the medical condition of the pregnant woman that it necessitates the immediate abortion of her pregnancy without first determining postfertilization age to avert her death or for which the delay necessary to determine postfertilization age will create serious risk of substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function, not including psychological or emotional conditions. No condition shall be deemed a medical emergency if based on a claim or diagnosis that the woman will engage in conduct which she intends to result in her death or in substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function;
6. “Reasonable medical judgment” means a medical judgment that would be made by a reasonably prudent physician, knowledgeable about the case and the treatment possibilities with respect to the medical conditions involved;
7. “Physician” means any person licensed to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery in this state;
8. “Probable postfertilization age of the unborn child” means what, in reasonable medical judgment, will with reasonable  probability be the postfertilization age of the unborn child at the time the abortion is planned to be performed or induced;
9. “Unborn child” or “fetus” each means an individual organism of the species homo sapiens from fertilization until live birth; and
10. “Woman” means a female human being whether or not she has reached the age of majority.
Added by Laws 2011, c. 89, § 2, eff. Nov. 1, 2011. §63-1-745.3. Legislative findings.
The Legislature of the State of Oklahoma finds that:
1. Pain receptors (nociceptors) are present throughout the unborn child’s entire body by no later than sixteen (16) weeks after fertilization and nerves link these receptors to the brain’s thalamus and subcortical plate by no later than twenty (20) weeks;
2. By eight (8) weeks after fertilization, the unborn child reacts to touch. After twenty (20) weeks, the unborn child reacts to stimuli that would be recognized as painful if applied to an adult human, for example by recoiling;
3. In the unborn child, application of such painful stimuli is associated with significant increases in stress hormones known as the stress response;
4. Subjection to such painful stimuli is associated with longterm harmful neurodevelopmental effects, such as altered pain sensitivity and, possibly, emotional, behavioral, and learning
disabilities later in life;
5. For the purposes of surgery on unborn children, fetal anesthesia is routinely administered and is associated with a decrease in stress hormones compared to their level when painful stimuli are applied without such anesthesia;
6. The position, asserted by some medical experts, that the unborn child is incapable of experiencing pain until a point later in pregnancy than twenty (20) weeks after fertilization predominately rests on the assumption that the ability to experience pain depends on the cerebral cortex and requires nerve connections between the thalamus and the cortex. However, recent medical research and analysis, especially since 2007, provides strong evidence for the conclusion that a functioning cortex is not necessary to experience pain;
7. Substantial evidence indicates that children born missing the bulk of the cerebral cortex, those with hydranencephaly, nevertheless experience pain;
8. In adults, stimulation or ablation of the cerebral cortex does not alter pain perception, while stimulation or ablation of the thalamus does;
9. Substantial evidence indicates that structures used for pain processing in early development differ from those of adults, using different neural elements available at specific times during development, such as the subcortical plate, to fulfill the role of pain processing;
10. The position, asserted by some, that the unborn child remains in a coma-like sleep state that precludes the unborn child from experiencing pain is inconsistent with the documented reaction of unborn children to painful stimuli and with the experience of fetal surgeons who have found it necessary to sedate the unborn child with anesthesia to prevent the unborn child from thrashing about in reaction to invasive surgery;
11. Consequently, there is substantial medical evidence that an unborn child is capable of experiencing pain by twenty (20) weeks after fertilization;
12. It is the purpose of the State of Oklahoma to assert a compelling state interest in protecting the lives of unborn children from the stage at which substantial medical evidence indicates that they are capable of feeling pain; and
13. Oklahoma’s compelling state interest in protecting the lives of unborn children from the stage at which substantial medical evidence indicates that they are capable of feeling pain is intended to be separate from and independent of Oklahoma’s compelling state interest in protecting the lives of unborn children from the stage of viability, and neither state interest is intended to replace the other.
Added by Laws 2011, c. 89, § 3, eff. Nov. 1, 2011. §63-1-745.4. Abortion requirements – Determination of probable postfertilization age of unborn child.
A. Except in the case of a medical emergency, no abortion shall be performed or induced or be attempted to be performed or induced unless the physician performing or inducing it has first made a determination of the probable postfertilization age of the unborn child or relied upon such a determination made by another physician. In making such a determination, the physician shall make such inquiries of the woman and perform or cause to be performed such medical examinations and tests as a reasonably prudent physician, knowledgeable about the case and the medical conditions involved, would consider necessary to perform in making an accurate diagnosis with respect to postfertilization age.
B. Knowing or reckless failure by any physician to conform to any requirement of this section constitutes “unprofessional conduct”.
Added by Laws 2011, c. 89, § 4, eff. Nov. 1, 2011.",https://oksenate.gov/sites/default/files/2019-12/os63.pdf
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Oklahoma,OK ST T. 63 § 1-745.5.,"Abortion prohibited after fetal heartbeat detectable, except in cases of medical emergency","§63-1-745.5. Abortions prohibited when probable postfertilization age of unborn child is 20 or more weeks – Exceptions – Procedure for
abortion.
A. No person shall perform or induce or attempt to perform or induce an abortion upon a woman when it has been determined, by the physician performing or inducing or attempting to perform or induce the abortion or by another physician upon whose determination that physician relies, that the probable postfertilization age of the woman’s unborn child is twenty (20) or more weeks, unless, in reasonable medical judgment, she has a condition which so complicates her medical condition as to necessitate the abortion of her pregnancy to avert her death or to avert serious risk of substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function, not including psychological or emotional conditions. No such condition shall be deemed to exist if it is based on a claim or diagnosis that the woman will engage in conduct which she intends to result in her death or in substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function.
B. When an abortion upon a woman whose unborn child has been determined to have a probable postfertilization age of twenty (20) or more weeks is not prohibited by this section, the physician shall terminate the pregnancy in the manner which, in reasonable medical judgment, provides the best opportunity for the unborn child to survive, unless, in reasonable medical judgment, termination of the pregnancy in that manner would pose a greater risk either of the death of the pregnant woman or of the substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function, not including psychological or emotional conditions, of the woman than would other available methods. No such greater risk shall be deemed to exist if it is based on a claim or diagnosis that the woman will engage in conduct which she intends to result in her death or in substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function.
Added by Laws 2011, c. 89, § 5, eff. Nov. 1, 2011.",https://oksenate.gov/sites/default/files/2019-12/os63.pdf
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Oregon,,No restrictions.,,
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Pennsylvania, PA ST 18 Pa.C.S.A. § 3211.,Abortion prohibited after 24 weeks except for medical emergency,"§ 3211.  Abortion on unborn child of 24 or more weeks gestational age.

(a)  Prohibition.--Except as provided in subsection (b), no person shall perform or induce an abortion upon another person when the gestational age of the unborn child is 24 or more weeks.

(b)  Exceptions.--

(1)  It shall not be a violation of subsection (a) if an abortion is performed by a physician and that physician reasonably believes that it is necessary to prevent either the death of the pregnant woman or the substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function of the woman. No abortion shall be deemed authorized under this paragraph if performed on the basis of a claim or a diagnosis that the woman will engage in conduct which would result in her death or in substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function.

(2)  It shall not be a violation of subsection (a) if the abortion is performed by a physician and that physician reasonably believes, after making a determination of the gestational age of the unborn child in compliance with section 3210 (relating to determination of gestational age), that the unborn child is less than 24 weeks gestational age.

(c)  Abortion regulated.--Except in the case of a medical emergency which, in the reasonable medical judgment of the physician performing the abortion, prevents compliance with a particular requirement of this subsection, no abortion which is authorized under subsection (b)(1) shall be performed unless each of the following conditions is met:

(1)  The physician performing the abortion certifies in writing that, based upon his medical examination of the pregnant woman and his medical judgment, the abortion is necessary to prevent either the death of the pregnant woman or the substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function of the woman.

(2)  Such physician's judgment with respect to the necessity for the abortion has been concurred in by one other licensed physician who certifies in writing that, based upon his or her separate personal medical examination of the pregnant woman and his or her medical judgment, the abortion is necessary to prevent either the death of the pregnant woman or the substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function of the woman.

(3)  The abortion is performed in a hospital.

(4)  The physician terminates the pregnancy in a manner which provides the best opportunity for the unborn child to survive, unless the physician determines, in his or her good faith medical judgment, that termination of the pregnancy in that manner poses a significantly greater risk either of the death of the pregnant woman or the substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function of the woman than would other available methods.

(5)  The physician performing the abortion arranges for the attendance, in the same room in which the abortion is to be completed, of a second physician who shall take control of the child immediately after complete extraction from the mother and shall provide immediate medical care for the child, taking all reasonable steps necessary to preserve the child's life and health.

(d)  Penalty.--Any person who violates subsection (a) commits a felony of the third degree. Any person who violates subsection (c) commits a misdemeanor of the second degree for the first offense and a misdemeanor of the first degree for subsequent offenses.

(Mar. 25, 1988, P.L.262, No.31, eff. 30 days; Nov. 17, 1989, P.L.592, No.64, eff. 60 days)",https://www.legis.state.pa.us/cfdocs/legis/LI/consCheck.cfm?txtType=HTM&ttl=18&div=0&chpt=32&sctn=11&subsctn=0
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Pennsylvania, PA ST 18 Pa.C.S.A. § 3203.,Abortion prohibited after viability.,"§ 3203.  Definitions.

The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:

""Abortion.""  The use of any means to terminate the clinically diagnosable pregnancy of a woman with knowledge that the termination by those means will, with reasonable likelihood, cause the death of the unborn child except that, for the purposes of this chapter, abortion shall not mean the use of an intrauterine device or birth control pill to inhibit or prevent ovulation, fertilization or the implantation of a fertilized ovum within the uterus.

""Born alive.""  When used with regard to a human being, means that the human being was completely expelled or extracted from her or his mother and after such separation breathed or showed evidence of any of the following: beating of the heart, pulsation of the umbilical cord, definite movement of voluntary muscles or any brain-wave activity.

""Complication.""  Includes but is not limited to hemorrhage, infection, uterine perforation, cervical laceration and retained products. The department may further define complication.

""Conscience.""  A sincerely held set of moral convictions arising from belief in and relation to a deity or which, though not so derived, obtains from a place in the life of its possessor parallel to that filled by a deity among adherents to religious faiths.

""Department.""  The Department of Health of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.

""Facility"" or ""medical facility.""  Any public or private hospital, clinic, center, medical school, medical training institution, health care facility, physician's office, infirmary, dispensary, ambulatory surgical treatment center or other institution or location wherein medical care is provided to any person.

""Fertilization"" and ""conception.""  Each term shall mean the fusion of a human spermatozoon with a human ovum.

""First trimester.""  The first 12 weeks of gestation.

""Gestational age.""  The age of the unborn child as calculated from the first day of the last menstrual period of the pregnant woman.

""Hospital.""  An institution licensed pursuant to the provisions of the law of this Commonwealth.

""In vitro fertilization.""  The purposeful fertilization of a human ovum outside the body of a living human female.

""Medical emergency.""  That condition which, on the basis of the physician's good faith clinical judgment, so complicates the medical condition of a pregnant woman as to necessitate the immediate abortion of her pregnancy to avert her death or for which a delay will create serious risk of substantial and irreversible impairment of major bodily function.

""Medical personnel.""  Any nurse, nurse's aide, medical school student, professional or any other person who furnishes, or assists in the furnishing of, medical care.

""Physician.""  Any person licensed to practice medicine in this Commonwealth. The term includes medical doctors and doctors of osteopathy.

""Pregnancy"" and ""pregnant.""  Each term shall mean that female reproductive condition of having a developing fetus in the body and commences with fertilization.

""Probable gestational age of the unborn child.""  What, in the judgment of the attending physician, will with reasonable probability be the gestational age of the unborn child at the time the abortion is planned to be performed.

""Unborn child"" and ""fetus.""  Each term shall mean an individual organism of the species homo sapiens from fertilization until live birth.

""Viability.""  That stage of fetal development when, in the judgment of the physician based on the particular facts of the case before him and in light of the most advanced medical technology and information available to him, there is a reasonable likelihood of sustained survival of the unborn child outside the body of his or her mother, with or without artificial support.

(Dec. 18, 1984, P.L.1057, No.207, eff. imd.; Mar. 25, 1988, P.L.262, No.31, eff. 30 days; Nov. 17, 1989, P.L.592, No.64, eff. 60 days)

 

1989 Amendment.  Act 64 amended the defs. of ""fertilization,"" ""pregnancy"" and ""unborn child"" and added the def. of ""gestational age.""

1988 Amendment.  Act 31 amended the def. of ""medical emergency"" and added the def. of ""physician.""",https://www.legis.state.pa.us/WU01/LI/LI/CT/HTM/18/00.032.003.000..HTM
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Puerto Rico, PRS ST T. 33 § 5147 ,Abortion prohibited except to preserve the life or health of the mother,,
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Rhode Island, RI ST § 23-4.13-2.,"Abortion prohibited after viability, except to preserve the life or health of the pregnant individual"," 23-4.13-2. Noninterference in reproductive health care.

(a) Neither the state, nor any of its agencies, or political subdivisions shall:

(1) Restrict an individual person from preventing, commencing, continuing, or terminating that individual’s pregnancy prior to fetal viability;

(2) Interfere with an individual person’s decision to continue that individual’s pregnancy after fetal viability;

(3) Restrict an individual person from terminating that individual’s pregnancy after fetal viability when necessary to preserve the health or life of that individual;

(4) Restrict the use of evidence-based, medically recognized methods of contraception or abortion except in accordance with evidence-based medically appropriate standards that are in compliance with state and federal statutes enumerated in subsections (c)(1) and (c)(2), department of health regulations and standards referenced in subsection (c)(3), and subsection (d); or

(5) Restrict access to evidence-based, medically recognized methods of contraception or abortion or the provision of such contraception or abortion except in accordance with evidence-based medically appropriate standards that are in compliance with state and federal statutes enumerated in subsections (c)(1) and (c)(2), department of health regulations and standards referenced in subsection (c)(3), and subsection (d).

(b) For purposes of this section, “fetal viability” means that stage of gestation where the attending physician, taking into account the particular facts of the case, has determined that there is a reasonable likelihood of the fetus’ sustained survival outside of the womb with or without artificial support.

(c) Notwithstanding the foregoing, this section shall not be construed to:

(1) Abrogate the provisions of §§ 11-9-18 titled “Care of babies born alive during attempted abortions,” 11-54-1 titled “Experimentation on human fetuses,” 23-4.6-1 titled “Consent to medical and surgical care,” 23-4.7-1 through 23-4.7-8 titled “Informed consent for abortion,” 23-13-21 titled “Comprehensive reproductive health services,” 23-17-11 titled “Abortion and sterilization — Protection for nonparticipation — Procedure,” or 42-157-3(d) of the section titled “Rhode Island Health Benefit Exchange — General requirements”;

(2) Abrogate the provisions of 18 U.S.C. § 1531, titled “Partial-birth abortions prohibited” and cited as the “Partial-Birth Abortion Ban Act of 2003”;

(3) Prevent the department of health from applying to licensed healthcare facilities that provide abortion any generally applicable regulations or standards that are in accordance with evidence-based, medically recognized standards for the provision of abortion in compliance with state and federal statutes enumerated in subsections (c)(1) and (c)(2) and with subsection (d), provided that such application, adoption or enforcement is not a pretext for violating subsection (a) of this section.

(d) The termination of an individual’s pregnancy after fetal viability is expressly prohibited except when necessary, in the medical judgment of the physician, to preserve the life or health of that individual.

(1) Any physician who knowingly violates the provisions of this subsection shall be deemed to have engaged in “unprofessional conduct” for the purpose of § 5-37-5.1.

(2) A physician who performs a termination after fetal viability shall be required to record in the patient’s medical records the basis for the physician’s medical judgment that termination was necessary to preserve the life or health of the patient and must comply with all other relevant requirements applicable to physicians in § 23-3-17.

(3) The director of the department of health is authorized to deny or revoke any license to practice allopathic or osteopathic medicine or otherwise discipline a licensee upon finding by the board that the person is guilty of unprofessional conduct under § 5-37-5.1(31).
",http://webserver.rilin.state.ri.us/Statutes/TITLE23/23-4.13/23-4.13-2.HTM
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,South Carolina, SC ST 44-41-650,Abortion prohibited after fetal heartbeat detectable.,"SECTION 44-41-650. Determination of detectable fetal heartbeat prior to abortion; penalties.

(A) Except as provided in Section 44-41-660, no person shall perform, induce, or attempt to perform or induce an abortion on a pregnant woman before a physician determines in accordance with Section 44-41-630 whether the human fetus the pregnant woman is carrying has a detectable fetal heartbeat.

(B) A person who violates subsection (A) is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, must be fined ten thousand dollars, imprisoned not more than two years, or both.

HISTORY: 2021 Act No. 1 (S.1), Section 3, eff February 18, 2021.",https://www.scstatehouse.gov/code/t44c041.php
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,South Carolina, SC ST 44-41-680,Abortion prohibited after fetal heartbeat detectable.,"SECTION 44-41-680. Performance of abortion prohibited if fetal heartbeat detected; exceptions; physician required to notify law enforcement after performing abortion in certain circumstances; penalties.

(A) Except as provided in subsection (B), no person shall perform, induce, or attempt to perform or induce an abortion on a pregnant woman with the specific intent of causing or abetting the termination of the life of the human fetus the pregnant woman is carrying and whose fetal heartbeat has been detected in accordance with Section 44-41-630.

(B) A physician may perform, induce, or attempt to perform or induce an abortion on a pregnant woman after a fetal heartbeat has been detected in accordance with Section 44-41-630 only if:

(1) the pregnancy is the result of rape, and the probable post-fertilization age of the fetus is fewer than twenty weeks;

(2) the pregnancy is the result of incest, and the probable post-fertilization age of the fetus is fewer than twenty weeks;

(3) the physician is acting in accordance with Section 44-41-690; or

(4) there exists a fetal anomaly, as defined in Section 44-41-430.

(C) A physician who performs or induces an abortion on a pregnant woman based on the exception in either subsection (B)(1) or (2) must report the allegation of rape or incest to the sheriff in the county in which the abortion was performed. The report must be made no later than twenty-four hours after performing or inducing the abortion, may be made orally or otherwise, and shall include the name and contact information of the pregnant woman making the allegation. Prior to performing or inducing an abortion, a physician who performs or induces an abortion based upon an allegation of rape or incest must notify the pregnant woman that the physician will report the allegation of rape or incest to the sheriff. The physician shall make written notations in the pregnant woman's medical records that the abortion was performed pursuant to the applicable exception, that the doctor timely notified the sheriff of the allegation of rape or incest, and that the woman was notified prior to the abortion that the physician would notify the sheriff of the allegation of rape or incest.

(D) A person who violates subsection (A) is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, must be fined ten thousand dollars, imprisoned not more than two years, or both.

HISTORY: 2021 Act No. 1 (S.1), Section 3, eff February 18, 2021.",https://www.scstatehouse.gov/code/t44c041.php
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,South Carolina,SC ST 44-41-690.,"Exceptions for rape or incest, death or serious bodily injury, and fetal anomalies incompatible with sustaining life after birth. ","SECTION 44-41-690. Exceptions to prevent death or serious risk of substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function; written documentation required.

(A) Section 44-41-680 does not apply to a physician who performs a medical procedure that, by any reasonable medical judgment, is designed or intended to prevent the death of the pregnant woman or to prevent the serious risk of a substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function of the pregnant woman.

(B) A physician who performs a medical procedure as described in subsection (A) shall declare, in a written document, that the medical procedure was necessary, by reasonable medical judgment, to prevent the death of the pregnant woman or to prevent the serious risk of a substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function of the pregnant woman. In the document, the physician shall specify the pregnant woman's medical condition that the medical procedure was asserted to address and the medical rationale for the physician's conclusion that the medical procedure was necessary to prevent the death of the pregnant woman or to prevent the serious risk of a substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function of the pregnant woman.

(C) A physician who performs a medical procedure as described in subsection (A) shall place the written document required by subsection (B) in the pregnant woman's medical records. For at least seven years from the date the document is created, the physician shall maintain a copy of the document in his own records.

HISTORY: 2021 Act No. 1 (S.1), Section 3, eff February 18, 2021.",https://www.scstatehouse.gov/code/t44c041.php
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,South Carolina, SC ST 44-41-430.,"Exceptions for rape or incest, death or serious bodily injury, and fetal anomalies incompatible with sustaining life after birth. ","SECTION 44-41-430. Definitions.

For the purposes of this article:

(1) ""Abortion"" means the use or prescription of any instrument, medicine, drug, or any other substance or device:

(a) to intentionally kill the unborn child of a woman known to be pregnant; or

(b) to intentionally prematurely terminate the pregnancy of a woman known to be pregnant, with an intention other than to increase the probability of a live birth or of preserving the life or health of the child after live birth.

(2) ""Attempt to perform or induce an abortion"" means an act, or an omission of a statutorily required act, that, under the circumstances as the actor believes them to be, constitutes a substantial step in a course of conduct planned to culminate in the performance or induction of an abortion in this State in violation of this article.

(3) ""Department"" means the South Carolina Department of Health and Environmental Control.

(4) ""Fertilization"" means the fusion of a human spermatozoon with a human ovum.

(5) ""Fetal anomaly"" means that, in reasonable medical judgment, the unborn child has a profound and irremediable congenital or chromosomal anomaly that, with or without the provision of life-preserving treatment, would be incompatible with sustaining life after birth.

(6) ""Medical emergency"" means a condition that, in reasonable medical judgment, so complicates the medical condition of the pregnant woman that it necessitates the immediate abortion of her pregnancy without first determining post-fertilization age to avert her death or for which the delay necessary to determine post-fertilization age will create serious risk of substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function, not including psychological or emotional conditions. No condition must be considered a medical emergency if based on a claim or diagnosis that the woman will engage in conduct which she intends to result in her death or in substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function.

(7) ""Physician"" means any person licensed to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery in this State.

(8) ""Post-fertilization age"" means the age of the unborn child as calculated from the fusion of a human spermatozoon with a human ovum.

(9) ""Probable post-fertilization age of the unborn child"" means what, in reasonable medical judgment, will with reasonable probability be the post-fertilization age of the unborn child at the time the abortion is planned to be performed or induced.

(10) ""Reasonable medical judgment"" means a medical judgment that would be made by a reasonably prudent physician, knowledgeable about the case and the treatment possibilities with respect to the medical conditions involved.

(11) ""Unborn child"" or ""fetus"" each means an individual organism of the species homo sapiens from fertilization until live birth.

(12) ""Woman"" means a female human being whether or not she has reached the age of majority.

HISTORY: 2016 Act No. 183 (H.3114), Section 1, eff May 25, 2016.","SECTION 44-41-690. Exceptions to prevent death or serious risk of substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function; written documentation required.

(A) Section 44-41-680 does not apply to a physician who performs a medical procedure that, by any reasonable medical judgment, is designed or intended to prevent the death of the pregnant woman or to prevent the serious risk of a substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function of the pregnant woman.

(B) A physician who performs a medical procedure as described in subsection (A) shall declare, in a written document, that the medical procedure was necessary, by reasonable medical judgment, to prevent the death of the pregnant woman or to prevent the serious risk of a substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function of the pregnant woman. In the document, the physician shall specify the pregnant woman's medical condition that the medical procedure was asserted to address and the medical rationale for the physician's conclusion that the medical procedure was necessary to prevent the death of the pregnant woman or to prevent the serious risk of a substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function of the pregnant woman.

(C) A physician who performs a medical procedure as described in subsection (A) shall place the written document required by subsection (B) in the pregnant woman's medical records. For at least seven years from the date the document is created, the physician shall maintain a copy of the document in his own records.

HISTORY: 2021 Act No. 1 (S.1), Section 3, eff February 18, 2021."
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,South Carolina,SC ST 44-41-710,"The provisions of the Fetal Heartbeat and Protection from Abortion Article, SC ST 44-41-610 to 740, do not abrogate SC ST 44-41-20. Procedures falling under exceptions to the Article may still be prohibited by other law. ","SECTION 44-41-710. Construction and application of article.

This article must not be construed to repeal, by implication or otherwise, Section 44-41-20 or any otherwise applicable provision of South Carolina law regulating or restricting abortion. An abortion that complies with this article but violates the provisions of Section 44-41-20 or any otherwise applicable provision of South Carolina law must be considered unlawful as provided in such provision. An abortion that complies with the provisions of Section 44-41-20 or any otherwise applicable provision of South Carolina law regulating or restricting abortion but violates this article must be considered unlawful as provided in this article. If some or all of the provisions of this article are ever temporarily or permanently restrained or enjoined by judicial order, all other provisions of South Carolina law regulating or restricting abortion must be enforced as though such restrained or enjoined provisions had not been adopted; provided, however, that whenever such temporary or permanent restraining order or injunction is stayed or dissolved, or otherwise ceases to have effect, such provisions shall have full force and effect.

HISTORY: 2021 Act No. 1 (S.1), Section 3, eff February 18, 2021.",https://www.scstatehouse.gov/code/t44c041.php
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,South Carolina,SC ST 44-41-10,Procedure to remove dead fetus excepted from definition of abortion,"As used in this chapter:

(a) ""Abortion"" means the use of an instrument, medicine, drug, or other substance or device with intent to terminate the pregnancy of a woman known to be pregnant for reasons other than to increase the probability of a live birth, to preserve the life or health of the child after live birth, or to remove a dead fetus.

(b) ""Physician"" means a person licensed to practice medicine in this State.

(c) ""Department"" means the South Carolina Department of Health and Environmental Control.

(d) ""Hospital"" means those institutions licensed for hospital operation by the department in accordance with Article 3, Chapter 7 of this title and which have also been certified by the department to be suitable facilities for the performance of abortions.

(e) ""Clinic"" shall mean any facility other than a hospital as defined in subsection (d) which has been licensed by the Department, and which has also been certified by the Department to be suitable for the performance of abortions.

(f) ""Pregnancy"" means the condition of a woman carrying a fetus or embryo within her body as the result of conception.

(g) ""Conception"" means the fecundation of the ovum by the spermatozoa.

(h) ""Consent"" means a signed and witnessed voluntary agreement to the performance of an abortion.

(i) ""First trimester of pregnancy"" means the first twelve weeks of pregnancy commencing with conception rather than computed on the basis of the menstrual cycle.

(j) ""Second trimester of pregnancy"" means that portion of a pregnancy following the twelfth week and extending through the twenty-fourth week of gestation.

(k) ""Third trimester of pregnancy"" means that portion of a pregnancy beginning with the twenty-fifth week of gestation.

(l) ""Viability"" means that stage of human development when the fetus is potentially able to live outside of the mother's womb with or without the aid of artificial life support systems. For the purposes of this chapter, a legal presumption is hereby created that viability occurs no sooner than the twenty-fourth week of pregnancy.

(m) ""Minor"" means a female under the age of seventeen.

(n) ""Emancipated minor"" means a minor who is or has been married or has by court order been freed from the care, custody, and control of her parents.

(o) ""In loco parentis"" means any person over the age of eighteen who has placed himself or herself in the position of a lawful parent by assuming obligations which are incidental to the parental relationship and has so served for a period of sixty days.

HISTORY: 1962 Code Section 32-681; 1974 (58) 2837; 1990 Act No. 341, Sections 2, 3; 1995 Act No. 1, Section 2.",https://www.scstatehouse.gov/code/t44c041.php
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,South Dakota,SD ST 22-17-5.1.,Abortion prohibited except to preserve the life of the pregnant female,"(Section effective on the date states are recognized by the United States Supreme Court to have the authority to prohibit abortion at all stages of pregnancy) Procurement of abortion prohibited--Exception to preserve life of pregnant female--Felony.

Any person who administers to any pregnant female or who prescribes or procures for any pregnant female any medicine, drug, or substance or uses or employs any instrument or other means with intent thereby to procure an abortion, unless there is appropriate and reasonable medical judgment that performance of an abortion is necessary to preserve the life of the pregnant female, is guilty of a Class 6 felony. (Section 7 of SL 2005, ch 187, as amended by SL 2005, ch 188, § 1, provides: ""This Act is effective on the date that the states are recognized by the United States Supreme Court to have the authority to prohibit abortion at all stages of pregnancy."")

 ",https://sdlegislature.gov/Statutes/Codified_Laws/2047216
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Tennessee, TN ST § 39-15-213. ,Abortion prohibited except to preserve the life or health of the pregnant woman.,"BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-15-213(a), is amended by adding
the following new subdivisions:
( ) ""Elective abortion"" means any abortion that is not a medically necessary
abortion;
( ) ""Medically necessary abortion"" means:
(A) An abortion that is performed or attempted by a licensed physician;
(B) The physician determined, in the physician's good faith medical judgment, based upon the facts known to the physician at the time, that the abortion was necessary to prevent the death of the pregnant woman or to prevent serious risk of substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function of the pregnant woman. No abortion shall be deemed medically necessary if performed on the basis of a claim or a diagnosis that the woman will engage in conduct that would result in her death or substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function or for any reason relating to her mental
health; and
(C) The physician performs or attempts to perform the abortion in the manner which, in the physician's good faith medical judgment, based upon the facts known to the physician at the time, provides the best opportunity for the unborn child to survive, unless in the physician's good faith medical judgment, termination of the pregnancy in that manner would pose a greater risk of the death of the pregnant woman or substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function. No such greater risk shall be deemed to exist if it is based on a claim or diagnosis that the woman will engage in conduct that would result in her death or substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function
or for any reason relating to her mental health;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-15-213(b), is amended by deleting the language ""A person who performs or attempts to perform an abortion commits the offense of criminal abortion."" and substituting instead the language ""A person who performs or attempts to perform an elective abortion commits the offense of criminal abortion."".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-15-213, is amended by deleting subsection (c).
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2023, the public welfare requiring it.",https://www.capitol.tn.gov/Bills/113/Bill/SB0983.pdf
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Tennessee,TN ST §39-15-213.,"Procedure to remove dead fetus exempted from definition of ""abortion"".","""BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-15-213(a), is amended by adding
the following new subdivisions:
( ) """"Elective abortion"""" means any abortion that is not a medically necessary
abortion;
( ) """"Medically necessary abortion"""" means:
(A) An abortion that is performed or attempted by a licensed physician;
(B) The physician determined, in the physician's good faith medical judgment, based upon the facts known to the physician at the time, that the abortion was necessary to prevent the death of the pregnant woman or to prevent serious risk of substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function of the pregnant woman. No abortion shall be deemed medically necessary if performed on the basis of a claim or a diagnosis that the woman will engage in conduct that would result in her death or substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function or for any reason relating to her mental
health; and
(C) The physician performs or attempts to perform the abortion in the manner which, in the physician's good faith medical judgment, based upon the facts known to the physician at the time, provides the best opportunity for the unborn child to survive, unless in the physician's good faith medical judgment, termination of the pregnancy in that manner would pose a greater risk of the death of the pregnant woman or substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function. No such greater risk shall be deemed to exist if it is based on a claim or diagnosis that the woman will engage in conduct that would result in her death or substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function
or for any reason relating to her mental health;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-15-213(b), is amended by deleting the language """"A person who performs or attempts to perform an abortion commits the offense of criminal abortion."""" and substituting instead the language """"A person who performs or attempts to perform an elective abortion commits the offense of criminal abortion."""".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-15-213, is amended by deleting subsection (c).
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2023, the public welfare requiring it.""",https://www.capitol.tn.gov/Bills/113/Bill/SB0983.pdf
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Tennessee,TN ST § 39-15-213.,Exception for medical treatment provided to the pregnant woman which results in accidental death or unintentional injury to the unborn child.,"""BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-15-213(a), is amended by adding
the following new subdivisions:
( ) """"Elective abortion"""" means any abortion that is not a medically necessary
abortion;
( ) """"Medically necessary abortion"""" means:
(A) An abortion that is performed or attempted by a licensed physician;
(B) The physician determined, in the physician's good faith medical judgment, based upon the facts known to the physician at the time, that the abortion was necessary to prevent the death of the pregnant woman or to prevent serious risk of substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function of the pregnant woman. No abortion shall be deemed medically necessary if performed on the basis of a claim or a diagnosis that the woman will engage in conduct that would result in her death or substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function or for any reason relating to her mental
health; and
(C) The physician performs or attempts to perform the abortion in the manner which, in the physician's good faith medical judgment, based upon the facts known to the physician at the time, provides the best opportunity for the unborn child to survive, unless in the physician's good faith medical judgment, termination of the pregnancy in that manner would pose a greater risk of the death of the pregnant woman or substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function. No such greater risk shall be deemed to exist if it is based on a claim or diagnosis that the woman will engage in conduct that would result in her death or substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function
or for any reason relating to her mental health;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-15-213(b), is amended by deleting the language """"A person who performs or attempts to perform an abortion commits the offense of criminal abortion."""" and substituting instead the language """"A person who performs or attempts to perform an elective abortion commits the offense of criminal abortion."""".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-15-213, is amended by deleting subsection (c).
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2023, the public welfare requiring it.""",https://www.capitol.tn.gov/Bills/113/Bill/SB0983.pdf
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Texas,"TX CIV ST Art. 4512.1.
","Abortions prohibited except in cases of medical
emergency. ","In Section 2, Chapter 62 (S.B. 8), and Section 4, Chapter 800 (H.B. 1280), Acts of the 87th Legislature, Regular Session, 2021, the legislature finds that the state statutes enacted before the ruling in Roe v. Wade, 410 U.S. 113 (1973), that prohibit and criminalize abortion unless the mother's life is in danger, have not been repealed by the legislature, either expressly or by implication.


Art. 4512.1. ABORTION.  If any person shall designedly administer to a pregnant woman or knowingly procure to be administered with her consent any drug or medicine, or shall use towards her any violence or means whatever externally or internally applied, and thereby procure an abortion, he shall be confined in the penitentiary not less than two nor more than five years; if it be done without her consent, the punishment shall be doubled. By ""abortion"" is meant that the life of the fetus or embryo shall be destroyed in the woman’s womb or that a premature birth thereof be caused.


Acts 1925, 39th Leg., R.S., S.B. 7, eff. September 1, 1925. Transferred from Art. 1191, Penal Code of Texas, 1925, by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 399 (S.B. 34), pg. 996e, eff. January 1, 1974.  ",https://statutes.capitol.texas.gov/Docs/CV/htm/CV.71.6-1_2.htm
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Texas,TX CIV ST Art. 4512.6.,"Trigger law will come into effect on August 25, 2022","Art. 4512.6. BY MEDICAL ADVICE.  Nothing in this chapter applies to an abortion procured or attempted by medical advice for the purpose of saving the life of the mother.


Acts 1925, 39th Leg., R.S., S.B. 7, eff. September 1, 1925. Transferred from Art. 1196, Penal Code of Texas, 1925, by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 399 (S.B. 34), pg. 996e, eff. January 1, 1974. ",https://statutes.capitol.texas.gov/Docs/CV/htm/CV.71.6-1_2.htm
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Utah,UT ST § 76-7a-201.,"Abortions prohibited except to preserve life or health of the woman, or if the fetus has a uniformly diagnosable and uniformly lethal defect, if the fetus has a severe brain abnormality that is uniformly diagnosable, or if the pregnancy is a result of rape, rape of a child, or incest.","Effective 6/24/2022
76-7a-201.  Abortion prohibition -- Exceptions -- Penalties.
(1)	An abortion may be performed in this state only under the following circumstances:
(a)	the abortion is necessary to avert:
(i)	the death of the woman on whom the abortion is performed; or
(ii)	a serious risk of substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function of the woman on whom the abortion is performed;
(b)	two physicians who practice maternal fetal medicine concur, in writing, in the patient's medical record that the fetus:
(i)	has a defect that is uniformly diagnosable and uniformly lethal; or
(ii)	has a severe brain abnormality that is uniformly diagnosable; or
(c)	(i)	the woman is pregnant as a result of:
(A)	rape;
(B)	rape of a child; or
(C)	incest; and
(ii)	before the abortion is performed, the physician who performs the abortion:
(A)	verifies that the incident described in Subsection (1)(c)(i) has been reported to law enforcement; and
(B)	if applicable, complies with requirements related to reporting suspicions of or known child abuse.
(2)	An abortion may be performed only:
(a)	by a physician; and
(b)	in an abortion clinic or a hospital, unless it is necessary to perform the abortion in another location due to a medical emergency.
(3)	A person who performs an abortion in violation of this section is guilty of a second degree felony.
(4)	In addition to the penalty described in Subsection (3), the department may take appropriate corrective action against an abortion clinic, including revoking the abortion clinic's license, if a violation of this chapter occurs at the abortion clinic.
(5)	The department shall report a physician's violation of any provision of this section to the state entity that regulates the licensing of a physician.


Enacted by Chapter 279, 2020 General Session",https://le.utah.gov/xcode/Title76/Chapter7a/76-7a-S201.html
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Vermont,18 VT ST §§ 9493 to 9498,"No restrictions.
Title 18, Part 9, Chapter 223 - Reproductive Rights - contains protections for reproductive rights (18 VT ST §§ 9493 to 9498),
including the fundamental right of every individual who becomes pregnant to choose to have an abortion."," 9493. Purpose and policy

(a) The State of Vermont recognizes the fundamental right of every individual to choose or refuse contraception or sterilization.

(b) The State of Vermont recognizes the fundamental right of every individual who becomes pregnant to choose to carry a pregnancy to term, to give birth to a child, or to have an abortion. (Added 2019, No. 47, § 2, eff. June 10, 2019.)

§ 9494. Interference with reproductive choice prohibited

(a) A public entity as defined in section 9496 of this title shall not, in the regulation or provision of benefits, facilities, services, or information, deny or interfere with an individual’s fundamental rights to choose or refuse contraception or sterilization or to choose to carry a pregnancy to term, to give birth to a child, or to obtain an abortion.

(b) No State or local law enforcement shall prosecute any individual for inducing, performing, or attempting to induce or perform the individual’s own abortion. (Added 2019, No. 47, § 2, eff. June 10, 2019.)


Subchapter 2: Prohibitions Relating To Access To Abortion
§ 9496. Definitions

As used in this subchapter:

(1) “Health care provider” means a person, partnership, or corporation, including a health care facility, that is licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized by law to provide professional health care services in this State to an individual during that individual’s medical care, treatment, or confinement.

(2) “Public entity” means:

(A) the Legislative, Executive, or Judicial Branch of State Government, or any agency, department, office, or other subdivision of State government, or any elective or appointive officer or employee within any of those branches; or

(B) any municipality, or any agency, department, office, or other subdivision of municipal government, or any elective or appointive officer or employee within municipal government. (Added 2019, No. 47, § 2, eff. June 10, 2019.)

§ 9497. Abortion; restricting access prohibited

A public entity shall not:

(1) deprive a consenting individual of the choice of terminating the individual’s pregnancy;

(2) interfere with or restrict, in the regulation or provision of benefits, facilities, services, or information, the choice of a consenting individual to terminate the individual’s pregnancy;

(3) prohibit a health care provider, acting within the scope of the health care provider’s license, from terminating or assisting in the termination of a patient’s pregnancy; or

(4) interfere with or restrict, in the regulation or provision of benefits, facilities, services, or information, the choice of a health care provider acting within the scope of the health care provider’s license to terminate or assist in the termination of a patient’s pregnancy. (Added 2019, No. 47, § 2, eff. June 10, 2019.)

§ 9498. Enforcement

(a) An individual injured as a result of a violation of this chapter shall have a private right of action in Superior Court against a public entity for injunctive relief arising from the violation.

(b) In addition to any injunctive relief awarded, the court may award costs and reasonable attorney’s fees to an injured person who substantially prevails in an action brought under this section. (Added 2019, No. 47, § 2, eff. June 10, 2019.)",https://legislature.vermont.gov/statutes/fullchapter/18/223
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Virginia,VA ST § 18.2-72.,Abortion allowed during first trimester.,"Notwithstanding any of the provisions of § 18.2-71, it shall be lawful for (i) any physician licensed by the Board of Medicine to practice medicine and surgery or (ii) any person jointly licensed by the Boards of Medicine and Nursing as a nurse practitioner and acting within such person's scope of practice to terminate or attempt to terminate a human pregnancy or aid or assist in the termination of a human pregnancy by performing an abortion or causing a miscarriage on any woman during the first trimester of pregnancy.",https://law.lis.virginia.gov/vacode/title18.2/chapter4/section18.2-72/
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Virginia,VA ST § 18.2-73.,Restrictions during second trimester.,"Notwithstanding any of the provisions of § 18.2-71 and in addition to the provisions of § 18.2-72, it shall be lawful for any physician licensed by the Board of Medicine to practice medicine and surgery, to terminate or attempt to terminate a human pregnancy or aid or assist in the termination of a human pregnancy by performing an abortion or causing a miscarriage on any woman during the second trimester of pregnancy and prior to the third trimester of pregnancy provided such procedure is performed in a hospital licensed by the State Department of Health or operated by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.",https://law.lis.virginia.gov/vacode/title18.2/chapter4/section18.2-73/
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Virginia,VA ST § 18.2-74.,Restrictions during third trimester.,"Notwithstanding any of the provisions of § 18.2-71 and in addition to the provisions of §§ 18.2-72 and 18.2-73, it shall be lawful for any physician licensed by the Board of Medicine to practice medicine and surgery to terminate or attempt to terminate a human pregnancy or aid or assist in the termination of a human pregnancy by performing an abortion or causing a miscarriage on any woman in a stage of pregnancy subsequent to the second trimester provided the following conditions are met:

(a) Said operation is performed in a hospital licensed by the Virginia State Department of Health or operated by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.

(b) The physician and two consulting physicians certify and so enter in the hospital record of the woman, that in their medical opinion, based upon their best clinical judgment, the continuation of the pregnancy is likely to result in the death of the woman or substantially and irremediably impair the mental or physical health of the woman.

(c) Measures for life support for the product of such abortion or miscarriage must be available and utilized if there is any clearly visible evidence of viability.",https://law.lis.virginia.gov/vacode/title18.2/chapter4/section18.2-74/
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Virginia,VA ST § 18.2-74.1.,Exception for medical emergency.,"In the event it is necessary for a licensed physician to terminate a human pregnancy or assist in the termination of a human pregnancy by performing an abortion or causing a miscarriage on any woman in order to save her life, in the opinion of the physician so performing the abortion or causing the miscarriage, §§ 18.2-71, 18.2-73 and 18.2-74 shall not be applicable.
",https://law.lis.virginia.gov/vacode/title18.2/chapter4/section18.2-74.1/
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,West Virginia,WV ST §16-2M-1.,Abortion prohibited after 22 weeks except to preserve life or health of patient,"§16-2M-1. Legislative findings.
The Legislature makes the following findings:

(1) Pain receptors (unborn child's entire body nociceptors) are present no later than sixteen weeks after fertilization and nerves link these receptors to the brain's thalamus and subcortical plate by no later than twenty weeks.

(2) By eight weeks after fertilization, the unborn child reacts to stimuli that would be recognized as painful if applied to an adult human, for example, by recoiling.

(3) In the unborn child, application of painful stimuli is associated with significant increases in stress hormones known as the stress response.

(4) Subjection to painful stimuli is associated with long- term harmful neuro developmental effects, such as altered pain sensitivity and, possibly, emotional, behavioral and learning disabilities later in life.

(5) For the purposes of surgery on unborn children, fetal anesthesia is routinely administered and is associated with a decrease in stress hormones compared to their level when painful stimuli is applied without the anesthesia.

(6) The position, asserted by some medical experts, that the unborn child is incapable of experiencing pain until a point later in pregnancy than twenty weeks after fertilization, which point in the pregnancy is generally consistent with twenty-two weeks following the woman's last menstrual cycle, predominately rests on the assumption that the ability to experience pain depends on the cerebral cortex and requires nerve connections between the thalamus and the cortex. However, recent medical research and analysis, especially since 2007, provides strong evidence for the conclusion that a functioning cortex is not necessary to experience pain.

(7) Substantial evidence indicates that children born missing the bulk of the cerebral cortex, those with hydranencephaly, nevertheless experience pain.

(8) In adults, stimulation or ablation of the cerebral cortex does not alter pain perception while stimulation or ablation of the thalamus does.

(9) Substantial evidence indicates that structures used for pain processing in early development differ from those of adults, using different neural elements available at specific times during development, such as the subcortical plate, to fulfill the role of pain processing.

(10) Consequently, there is substantial medical evidence that an unborn child is capable of experiencing pain by pain capable gestational age as defined in subsection (7), section two, article two-m of this chapter.

(11) It is the purpose of the state to assert a compelling state interest in protecting the lives of unborn children from the stage at which substantial medical evidence indicates that they are capable of feeling pain.",https://code.wvlegislature.gov/16-2M-1/
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,West Virginia,WV ST § 16-2M-4.,Abortion prohibited after 22 weeks except to preserve life or health of patient.,"(a) No person may perform or induce, or attempt to perform or induce, an abortion when it has been determined, by the physician performing or inducing or attempting to perform or induce the abortion or by another physician upon whose determination that physician relies, that the probable gestational age of the fetus has reached the pain capable gestational age, unless in the reasonable medical judgment of a reasonably prudent physician there exists a nonmedically viable fetus or the patient has a condition that, on the basis of a reasonably prudent physician's reasonable medical judgment, so complicates her medical condition as to necessitate the abortion of her pregnancy to avert her death or to avert serious risk of substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function, not including psychological or emotional conditions. No condition may be deemed a medical emergency if based on a claim or diagnosis that the woman will engage in conduct which she intends to result in her death or in substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function.

(b) When an abortion upon a patient whose fetus has been determined to have a probable gestational age that has reached the pain capable gestational age is not prohibited by subsection (a) of this section, the physician shall terminate the pregnancy in the manner which, in reasonable medical judgment, provides the best opportunity for the fetus to survive, unless, in reasonable medical judgment, termination of the pregnancy in that manner would pose a greater risk either of the death of the patient or of the substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function of the patient than would other available methods.
",https://code.wvlegislature.gov/16-2M-4/
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Wisconson,WI ST 940.04,Abortion prohibited except to preserve life of mother.,"(1)  Any person, other than the mother, who intentionally destroys the life of an unborn child is guilty of a Class H felony.
(2) Any person, other than the mother, who does either of the following is guilty of a Class E felony:
(a) Intentionally destroys the life of an unborn quick child; or
(b) Causes the death of the mother by an act done with intent to destroy the life of an unborn child. It is unnecessary to prove that the fetus was alive when the act so causing the mother's death was committed.
(5) This section does not apply to a therapeutic abortion which:
(a) Is performed by a physician; and
(b) Is necessary, or is advised by 2 other physicians as necessary, to save the life of the mother; and
940.04(5)(c)(c) Unless an emergency prevents, is performed in a licensed maternity hospital.
(6) In this section “unborn child"" means a human being from the time of conception until it is born alive.
History: 2001 a. 109; 2011 a. 217.
Aborting a child against a father's wishes does not constitute intentional infliction of emotional distress. Przybyla v. Przybyla, 87 Wis. 2d 441, 275 N.W.2d 112 (Ct. App. 1978).
Sub. (2) (a) proscribes feticide. It does not apply to consensual abortions. It was not impliedly repealed by the adoption of s. 940.15 in response to Roe, 410 U.S. 113 (1973). State v. Black, 188 Wis. 2d 639, 526 N.W.2d 132 (1994).
The common law “year-and-a-day rule"" that no homicide is committed unless the victim dies within a year and a day after the injury is inflicted is abrogated, with prospective application only. State v. Picotte, 2003 WI 42, 261 Wis. 2d 249, 661 N.W.2d 381, 01-3063.
This section is cited as similar to a Texas statute that was held to violate the due process clause of the 14th amendment, which protects against state action the right to privacy, including a woman's qualified right to terminate her pregnancy. Roe v. Wade, 410 U.S. 113, 93 S. Ct. 705, 35 L. Ed. 2d 147 (1973).
The state may prohibit first trimester abortions by nonphysicians. Connecticut v. Menillo, 423 U.S. 9, 96 S. Ct. 170, 46 L. Ed. 2d 152 (1975).
Discussing the viability of an unborn child. Colautti v. Franklin, 439 U.S. 379, 99 S. Ct. 675, 58 L. Ed. 2d 596 (1979).
Poverty is not a constitutionally suspect classification. Encouraging childbirth except in the most urgent circumstances is rationally related to the legitimate governmental objective of protecting potential life. Harris v. McRae, 448 U.S. 297, 100 S. Ct. 2671, 65 L. Ed. 2d 784 (1980).
Discussing abortion issues. City of Akron v. Akron Center for Reproductive Health, Inc., 462 U.S. 416, 103 S. Ct. 2481, 76 L. Ed. 2d 687 (1983); Planned Parenthood Ass'n of Kansas City, Missouri, Inc. v. Ashcroft, 462 U.S. 476, 103 S. Ct. 2517, 76 L. Ed. 2d 733 (1983); Simopoulas v. Virginia, 462 U.S. 506, 103 S. Ct. 2532, 76 L. Ed. 2d 755 (1983).
The essential holding of Roe, 410 U.S. 113 (1973), allowing abortion is upheld, but various state restrictions on abortion are permissible. Planned Parenthood of Southeastern Pennsylvania v. Casey, 505 U.S. 833, 112 S. Ct. 2791, 120 L. Ed. 2d 674 (1992).
Wisconsin's abortion statute, former s. 940.04, 1969 stats., is unconstitutional as applied to the abortion of an embryo that has not quickened. Babbitz v. McCann, 310 F. Supp. 293 (1970).
When U.S. Supreme Court decisions clearly made Wisconsin's antiabortion statute unenforceable, the issue in a physician's action for injunctive relief against enforcement became mooted, and it no longer presented a case or controversy over which the court could have jurisdiction. Larkin v. McCann, 368 F. Supp. 1352 (1974).",https://docs.legis.wisconsin.gov/statutes/statutes/940/i/04
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Wyoming,WY ST § 35-6-102.,Abortion prohibited except to preserve life or health of the woman or if the pregnancy is the result of incest or sexual assault.,"(a) An abortion shall not be performed after the embryo or fetus has reached viability except when necessary to preserve the woman from an imminent peril that substantially endangers her life or health, according to appropriate medical judgment. This subsection is repealed on the date that subsection (b) of this section becomes effective.
(b) An abortion shall not be performed except when necessary to preserve the woman from a serious risk of death or of substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function, not including any psychological or emotional conditions, or the pregnancy is the result of incest as defined by W.S. 6-4-402 or sexual assault as defined by W.S. 6-2-301. This subsection shall be effective five (5) days after the date that the governor, on advice of the attorney general, certifies to the secretary of state that the supreme court of the United States has overruled Roe v. Wade, 410 U.S. 113 (1973) in a manner that would authorize the enforcement of this subsection or has otherwise issued a final decision related to abortion that would authorize the enforcement of this subsection in accordance with that decision and without violating any conditions, rights or restrictions recognized by the supreme court.
(c) For purposes of subsection (b) of this section the attorney general shall review any final decisions of the supreme court of the United States related to Roe v. Wade, 410 U.S. 113 (1973) or otherwise related to abortion to determine whether the enforcement of subsection (b) of this section would be fully authorized under that decision. The attorney general shall, within thirty (30) days of the date of the final decision of the supreme court, report the results of each review under this subsection to the joint judiciary interim committee and the governor who may, if applicable, certify the results of the review to the office of the secretary of state. ",https://wyoleg.gov/statutes/compress/title35.pdf
Statutory,Abortion Laws,Gestational Age restrictions and exceptions,Wyoming,WY ST § 35-6-102.,"WY ST §35-6-102 is currently enjoined by Johnson v. State, No. 18732, 2022 WL 3009719, (Wyo.Dist. July 28, 2022) and considered repealed","""(a) An abortion shall not be performed after the embryo or fetus has reached viability except when necessary to preserve the woman from an imminent peril that substantially endangers her life or health, according to appropriate medical judgment. This subsection is repealed on the date that subsection (b) of this section becomes effective.
(b) An abortion shall not be performed except when necessary to preserve the woman from a serious risk of death or of substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function, not including any psychological or emotional conditions, or the pregnancy is the result of incest as defined by W.S. 6-4-402 or sexual assault as defined by W.S. 6-2-301. This subsection shall be effective five (5) days after the date that the governor, on advice of the attorney general, certifies to the secretary of state that the supreme court of the United States has overruled Roe v. Wade, 410 U.S. 113 (1973) in a manner that would authorize the enforcement of this subsection or has otherwise issued a final decision related to abortion that would authorize the enforcement of this subsection in accordance with that decision and without violating any conditions, rights or restrictions recognized by the supreme court.
(c) For purposes of subsection (b) of this section the attorney general shall review any final decisions of the supreme court of the United States related to Roe v. Wade, 410 U.S. 113 (1973) or otherwise related to abortion to determine whether the enforcement of subsection (b) of this section would be fully authorized under that decision. The attorney general shall, within thirty (30) days of the date of the final decision of the supreme court, report the results of each review under this subsection to the joint judiciary interim committee and the governor who may, if applicable, certify the results of the review to the office of the secretary of state. """,https://wyoleg.gov/statutes/compress/title35.pdf